SPEAKERS CONTENTS INSERTS Tables Page 1 TOP OF DOC 58-001 1999 IMMIGRATION AND AMERICA'S WORKFORCE FOR THE 21ST CENTURY HEARING BEFORE THE SUBCOMMITTEE ON IMMIGRATION AND CLAIMS OF THE COMMITTEE ON THE JUDICIARY HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES ONE HUNDRED FIFTH CONGRESS SECOND SESSION APRIL 21, 1998 Serial No. 93 Printed for the use of the Committee on the Judiciary Page 2 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
COMMITTEE ON THE JUDICIARY HENRY J. HYDE, Illinois, Chairman F. JAMES SENSENBRENNER, Jr., Wisconsin BILL McCOLLUM, Florida GEORGE W. GEKAS, Pennsylvania HOWARD COBLE, North Carolina LAMAR SMITH, Texas ELTON GALLEGLY, California CHARLES T. CANADY, Florida BOB INGLIS, South Carolina BOB GOODLATTE, Virginia STEPHEN E. BUYER, Indiana ED BRYANT, Tennessee STEVE CHABOT, Ohio BOB BARR, Georgia WILLIAM L. JENKINS, Tennessee ASA HUTCHINSON, Arkansas EDWARD A. PEASE, Indiana CHRIS CANNON, Utah JAMES E. ROGAN, California LINDSEY O. GRAHAM, South Carolina MARY BONO, California JOHN CONYERS, Jr., Michigan Page 3 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
BARNEY FRANK, Massachusetts CHARLES E. SCHUMER, New York HOWARD L. BERMAN, California RICK BOUCHER, Virginia JERROLD NADLER, New York ROBERT C. SCOTT, Virginia MELVIN L. WATT, North Carolina ZOE LOFGREN, California SHEILA JACKSON LEE, Texas MAXINE WATERS, California MARTIN T. MEEHAN, Massachusetts WILLIAM D. DELAHUNT, Massachusetts ROBERT WEXLER, Florida STEVEN R. ROTHMAN, New Jersey THOMAS E. MOONEY, Chief of Staff-General Counsel JULIAN EPSTEIN, Minority Staff Director Subcommittee on Immigration and Claims LAMAR S. SMITH, Texas, Chairman ELTON GALLEGLY, California WILLIAM L. JENKINS, Tennessee EDWARD A. PEASE, Indiana CHRIS CANNON, Utah ED BRYANT, Tennessee Page 4 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
JAMES E. ROGAN, California MELVIN L. WATT, North Carolina CHARLES E. SCHUMER, New York HOWARD L. BERMAN, California ZOE LOFGREN, California ROBERT WEXLER, Florida CORDIA A. STROM, Chief Counsel EDWARD R. GRANT, Counsel GEORGE FISHMAN, Counsel MARTINA HONE, Minority Counsel C O N T E N T S HEARING DATE April 21, 1998 OPENING STATEMENT Smith, Hon. Lamar, a Representative in Congress from the State of Texas, and chairman, Subcommittee on Immigration and Claims WITNESSES Borjas, George J., John F. Kennedy School of Government, Harvard University Page 5 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Fraser, John R., Acting Administrator, Wage and Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration, U.S. Department of Labor Hatano, Daryl, Vice President for International Trade 
General Accounting Office Lariviere, Richard W., Associate Vice President of International Programs, University of Texas at Austin Matloff, Norman, Department of Computer Science, University of California at Davis Miller, Harris N., President, Information Technology Association of America Payson, William S., President, The Senior Staff Reynolds, Alan, Director of Economic Research, Hudson Institute Smith, David A., Director of Policy, AFL-CIO Page 6 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Sullivan, Daniel L., Senior Vice President for Human Resources, QUALCOMM, Incorporated Vernez, Georges, Director, Center for Research on Immigration Policy, RAND LETTERS, STATEMENTS, ETC., SUBMITTED FOR THE HEARING Borjas, George J., John F. Kennedy School of Government, Harvard University: Prepared statement Fraser, John R., Acting Administrator, Wage and Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration, U.S. Department of Labor: Prepared statement Hatano, Daryl, Vice President for International Trade 
General Accounting Office: Prepared statement Klink, Hon. Ron, a Representative in Congress from the State of Pennsylvania: Prepared statement Page 7 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Lariviere, Richard W., Associate Vice President of International Programs, University of Texas at Austin: Prepared statement Matloff, Norman, Department of Computer Science, University of California at Davis: Prepared statement Miller, Harris N., President, Information Technology Association of America: Prepared statement Payson, William S., President, The Senior Staff: Prepared statement Reynolds, Alan, Director of Economic Research, Hudson Institute: Prepared statement Rogan, Hon. James, a Representative in Congress from the State of California: Prepared statement San Francisco Examiner Smith, David A., Director of Policy, AFL-CIO: Prepared statement Smith, Hon. Lamar, a Representative in Congress from the State of Texas, and chairman, Subcommittee on Immigration and Claims: Prepared statement Page 8 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Sullivan, Daniel L., Senior Vice President for Human Resources, QUALCOMM, Incorporated: Prepared statement Vernez, Georges, Director, Center for Research on Immigration Policy, RAND: Prepared statement APPENDIXES Appendix 1.--Prepared statement from American Electronics Association Appendix 2.--Prepared statement from The American Council on International Personnel, Inc.
Appendix 3.--Prepared statement from American Engineering Association, Inc.
Appendix 4.--Prepared statement from Federation for American Immigration Reform Appendix 5.--Prepared statement from The National Association of Manufacturers Appendix 6.--Prepared statement from The American Immigration Lawyers Association Appendix 7.--Prepared statement from The National Technical Services Association Page 9 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
IMMIGRATION AND AMERICA'S WORKFORCE FOR THE 21ST CENTURY TUESDAY, APRIL 21, 1998 House of Representatives, Subcommittee on Immigration and Claims, Committee on the Judiciary, Washington, DC.
The subcommittee met, pursuant to call, at 9:36 a.m., in Room 2237, Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. Lamar S.
Smith [chairman of the subcommittee] presiding.
Present: Representatives Lamar S.
Smith, Edward A. Pease, James E. Rogan, Melvin L. Watt, and Zoe Lofgren.
Staff Present: George Fishman, Counsel; Judy Knott, Staff Assistant; and Martina Hone, Minority Counsel.
OPENING STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN SMITH Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
The Subcommittee on Immigration and Claims will come to order.
Page 10 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Before we go to opening statements and then hear from our first panel, I do have some housekeeping comments to make that go to a number of areas.
We are going to proceed a little bit out of order this morning, not that there was any set order to begin with, but for a number of reasons, we are going to have our third panel first, and then the rest of the panels will be in the original order.
Which is to say that after the third panel, we will hear from the administration, and then we will hear from the various groups about H-1Bs, so the third panel will be up first.
Because of the number of witnesses we have today and because of the need of a number of individuals to catch planes and so forth, I am going to have to be strict about enforcing the 5-minute rule, perhaps stricter than I have been before.
We will try to finish up by noon today, if at all possible.
Also, in the way of announcements, let me say that we are expecting additional members who are now in transit, to arrive shortly, including our Ranking Member, Mel Watt.
Other members besides Mr. Watt are literally taking planes from their districts to try to arrive this morning.
I know Ed Pease is coming in from Indiana momentarily, and Elton Gallegly and Zoe Lofgren and others will arrive.
But because of the various time commitments that our witnesses have, we are going to go on and get off to an early start.
Let me ask the members of the third panel if they will come forward and take their seats, and then we will have opening statements.
The third panel, I think they are all here.
Good.
I will introduce them shortly.
But first I would like to make an opening statement and recognize other members as well.
Page 11 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Today's hearing on immigration and the American work force for the 21st century will be one of the most important this subcommittee will hold in this Congress.
Immigration is having an ever-increasing impact on America's work force.
Since two-thirds of America's future population growth will be caused by immigration, it will continue to transform our work force, for the better or for the worse, into the new century.
Most people are content to sit back and enjoy the ride of our current economy.
But driving carries responsibilities such as keeping the tank full of gas and watching out for hazards.
According to the recent work of a growing number of respected researchers, several of whom are here today, our economy is already hitting some potholes, especially for those who lack a high school education.
And our economic engine will sputter without a steady supply of ever more highly educated workers.
This research is like a warning light on the dashboard.
We have time to get to a service station, but we had better not wait too long.
Ninety percent of all future jobs will require a high school diploma as a minimum qualification.
The Hudson Institute in its publication, ''Work Force 2020,'' reports that, ''Unless the education and skill levels of the American work force are upgraded, America's productivity and prosperity will grow less quickly.''
It will be tough going for low-skilled Americans.
It will also be tough going for American businesses if sufficient high school workers cannot be found.
Page 12 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
A rational immigration policy would not put obstacles in the path of low-skilled Americans and American businesses.
A rational immigration policy would not flood the job market with low-skilled immigrants to compete for the comparatively stagnant number of low-skilled jobs while depriving the economy of the skilled immigrants it needs.
Eighty-seven percent of immigrants admitted in 1996 were admitted without regard to skills or education.
A disturbing 42 percent of family-sponsored immigrants have less than a high school education.
What is the result of our skewed admission policy? The National Research Council in its report, ''The New Americans,'' finds 44 percent of the decline in the relative wage of high school dropouts between 1980 and 1994 can be attributed to the large influx of low-skilled immigrants during that period.
As the Commission on Immigration Reform noted, ''Unskilled foreign workers present the greatest potential for adverse impact because they are competing with some of the most vulnerable of American workers.''
It is not surprising that the Hudson Institute states in ''Work Force 2020,'' that, ''U.S. immigration policy serves primarily to increase the number of U.S. residents who lack even a high school degree.
America must stop recruiting workers for jobs that do not exist or exist only at the lowest wages.''
It is not surprising that the RAND Corporation in its recent report, ''Immigration in a Changing Economy: California's Experience,'' states the widening gap between the number of jobs available for noncollege-educated workers and the increasing number of new noncollege-educated immigrants signals growing competition for jobs and, hence, further decline in relative earnings at the low end of the labor market.
RAND concludes that, ''There appears to be a growing divergence between current trends in the State's economy and immigration policies that are producing a steady inflow of poorly-educated immigrants.
Specifically, we recommend that current policies be modified to place greater emphasis on the educational levels of new immigrants.''
Page 13 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
One prime example of the need for a more educated work force is in the information technology industry.
The Department of Labor reports that this will be the fastest-growing industry over the next 10 years and that the three fastest-growing occupations will be information technology occupations.
At the same time, the Information Technology Association of America reports that there are already 346,000 vacancies in information technology positions.
Silicon Valley warns us that unless the 65,000 cap on H-1B visas for highly skilled workers is dramatically increased, the American economy will suffer.
A number of witnesses will present us with evidence this morning that there is a growing level of unmet demand for information technology jobs.
The question this subcommittee needs to address is to what extent the demand should be met through an increase in the quota for H-1B workers.
Most likely we will need some increase in the cap for at least a few years while we let the law of supply and demand take effect.
Presumably, plentiful jobs and increasing salaries will encourage more American college students to study technology.
I believe this is already happening.
Also, we may need some increase in the quota for at least a few years while America's primary and secondary schools emphasize the teaching of math and science.
But the immediate demand can also be alleviated by the retraining of American workers, both information technology workers who need skill upgrades and workers new to the field.
And we need to make sure that the information technology industry does not use foreign workers to displace American workers.
Page 14 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
By taking advantage of the expertise of today's witnesses, we will be able to decide as a subcommittee how much of the present demand for information technology workers needs to be met through the increased importation of workers on H-1B visas.
That concludes my opening statement.
We will go to the gentleman from California, Mr. Rogan, for an opening statement.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Smith follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. LAMAR SMITH, CHAIRMAN Today's hearing on Immigration and the American Workforce for the 21st Century will be one of the most important this Subcommittee will hold in the 105th Congress.
Immigration is having an ever-increasing impact on America's workforce.
Since two-thirds of America's future population growth will be caused by immigration, it will continue to transform our workforce--for the better or the worse--into a new century.
Most people are content to sit back and enjoy the ride of our current economy.
But driving carries responsibilities such as keeping the tank full of gas and watching out for hazards.
According to the recent work of a growing number of respected researchers, several of whom are here today, our economy is already hitting some potholes, especially for those who lack a high school education.
And our economic engine will sputter without a steady supply of every-more-highly educated workers.
Page 15 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
This research is like a warning light on the dashboard.
We have time to get to a service station.
But we had better not wait too long.
By 2006, the Labor Department projects that there will be over 150 million jobs in America, almost 19 million more than there were in 1996.
America will indeed be a land of opportunity.
But the opportunity won't be for everyone.
Ninety-two percent of these jobs will require a high school diploma as a minimum qualification.
The Hudson Institute, in its publication Workforce 2020, reports that ''[j]obs that are disappearing require much lower levels of skill than jobs that are being created.
Unless the education and skill levels of the American workforce are upgraded, America's productivity and prosperity will grow less quickly.
. . .
'' It will be tough going for low-skilled Americans.
It will also be tough going for American business if sufficient high-skilled workers cannot be found.
A rationale immigration policy would not put obstacles in the path of low-skilled Americans and American businesses.
A rationale immigration policy would not flood the job market with low-skilled immigrants to compete for the comparatively stagnant number of low-skilled jobs, while depriving the economy of the skilled immigrants it needs.
Eighty-seven percent immigrants in 1996 were admitted without regard to skill or education.
A disturbing 42% of family-sponsored immigrants have less than a high-school education.
What is the result of our skewed admission policy? The National Research Council in its report The New Americans finds that 44% of the decline in the relative wage of high school dropouts between 1980 and 1994 can be attributed to the large influx of low-skilled immigrants during that period.
Page 16 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
As the Commission on Immigration Reform noted, ''unskilled foreign workers present the greatest potential for adverse impact because they are competing with some of the most vulnerable of American workers.''
It is not surprising that the Hudson Institute states in Workforce 2020 that ''U.S. firms should press for enlightened immigration policies that give preference to skilled workers.
. . .
Instead of providing key industries with large numbers of highly educated immigrants, however, U.S. immigration policy serves primarily to increase the number of U.S. residents who lack even a high-school degree.
America must stop recruiting workers for jobs that do not exist or exist only at the lowest wages.''
It is not surprising that the RAND Corporation, in its recent report Immigration in a Changing Economy: California's Experience, states that ''th[e] widening gap between the number of jobs available for non-college-educated workers and the increasing number of new non-college-educated immigrants signals growing competition for jobs and, hence, further decline in relative earnings at the low end of the labor market.''
RAND concludes that ''there appears to be a growing divergence between current trends in the state's economy and the immigration policies that are producing a steady inflow of poorly educated immigrants.
. . .
Specifically, we recommend that current policies be modified . . . to place greater emphasis on the educational levels of new immigrants.''
One prime example of the need for a more educated workforce is in the information technology industry.
The Department of Labor reports that this will be the fastest growing industry over the next ten years and that the three fastest growing occupations will be information technology occupations.
Page 17 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
At the same time, the Information Technology Association of America reports that there are already 346,000 vacancies in information technology positions.
Silicon Valley warns us that unless the 65,000 cap on ''H-1B'' visas for high-skilled workers is dramatically increased, the American economy will suffer.
A number of witnesses will present us with evidence this morning that there is a growing level of unmet demand for information technology jobs.
The question this Subcommittee needs to address is to what extent the demand should be met through an increase in the quota for H-1B workers.
Most likely we will need some increase in the quota for at least a few years while we let the law of supply and demand take effect.
Presumably, plentiful jobs and increasing salaries will encourage more American college students to study information technology.
I believe this is already happening.
Also, we may need some increase in the quota for at least a few years while America's primary and secondary schools emphasize the teaching of math and science.
But the immediate demand may be alleviated by the retraining of American workers--both information technology workers who need skill upgrades and workers new to the field.
And we need to make sure that the information technology industry does not use foreign workers to displace American workers.
By taking advantage of the expertise of today's witnesses, we will be able to decide as a Subcommittee how much of the present demand for information technology workers needs to be met through the increased importation of workers on H-1B visas.
Page 18 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. ROGAN.
Mr. Chairman, thank you, and thank you for calling this hearing.
Because of the number of witnesses we have before us today, rather than present my opening statement at this time, I ask unanimous consent that both my opening statement and a newspaper article written by our colleague from California, Mr. Dreier, be included as part of the record.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Without objection, both your opening statement and the article will be made a part of the record.
[The information referred to follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JAMES ROGAN, A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS FROM THE STATE OF CALIFORNIA Thank you Mr. Chairman.
To begin I would like to thank you for your leadership in authoring this important legislation and calling today's hearing.
As the committee knows, H.R. 3736, the ''Workforce Improvement and Protection Act of 1998'' will raise the cap on the number of H-1b employment visas issued to highly skilled foreign professionals hired by American businesses.
High technology businesses and research universities vitally need this program to recruit foreign talent, especially where an insufficient number of highly skilled Americans are available to fill current job openings.
One recent report states that the computer industry has 340,000 unfilled jobs, while American universities produce only 130,000 computer science graduates a year.
In order to compete globally, American businesses and universities need the ability to freely hire foreign talent to fill some of these positions.
I understand that the current cap of 65,000 H-1b visas will be reached very soon and when that occurs the INS will no longer issue H-1b visas for the remainder of this year.
Page 19 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Raising the cap on H-1b visas will give American businesses the ability to expand and compete globally.
I support raising the present cap from 65,000 to 95,000 for 1998, and to 115,000 by the year 2000.
H.R. 3736 also directs tough enforcement action where it is needed--against those who abuse the program at the expense of American workers.
Under the bill, employers who willfully violate the H-1b program face fines that are five times higher than current law.
Furthermore, it authorizes additional penalties up to $25,000 on top of those penalties.
It also permits the Department of Labor to engage in spot inspections of known violators for a period of up to five years.
These important enforcement provisions are necessary and appropriate.
However, I want to bring to the committees attention my serious concerns about other provisions in the bill.
What it purports to give with one hand it takes away with the other by imposing a new regulatory structure on businesses that hire H-1b employees.
These new requirements may render the program unusable to a large number of American businesses.
H.R. 3736 in its present form increases the Labor Department's authority to initiate investigations on its own.
Currently, a complaint surrounding any business is required to commence a Department of Labor investigation.
Giving the Labor Department free reign absent any complaint is unwise and potentially unworkable because it would discourage businesses from employing H-1b professionals.
Business groups oppose this provision because it would subject those with a higher percentage of H-1b professionals to significantly increased investigations and costs without requiring the Labor Department to implement clearer enforcement guidelines.
Further, the Labor Department has a history of not promulgating clear and consistent regulations in this area.
In fact, eight years after Congress instituted Labor Department involvement in the B-1b program, there are still no final regulations.
Page 20 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Even more troubling, this bill adds two new regulatory requirements in the form of layoff and recruitment attestation clauses.
At first blush, these attestation clauses appear to be reasonable safeguards that provide protection for American workers so they will not lose their jobs to H-1b employees.
In reality, these new requirements will add onerous and unnecessary burdens on American businesses.
A vast array of employers oppose the layoff attestation because it would place them under the scrutiny of the Department of Labor every time they have to make decisions regarding their personnel.
This alone would effectively eliminate the use of H-1bs by many employers.
These attestation provisions require much more than merely ''checking off a box.''
To ensure compliance, the government would be allowed to micro-manage the human resource policies of American businesses.
These additional attestations would seriously harm American employers' ability to recruit the best-qualified people and go after the talent necessary to maintain American superiority against foreign competitors, and could force U.S. companies to move jobs overseas where high tech workers are available.
Current law already contains safeguards to protect American workers.
Presently all H-1b employers must attest that: they are paying the foreign professional a wage that is the higher of what is typically paid in the region for that type of work (''prevailing wage''), or what the employer pays its existing employees with similar experience and duties; the working conditions of its American workers are not adversely affected; Page 21 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
there is no strike/lockout at the worksite, or in the occupation for which the foreign professional is sought; it has posted notice to current employees that it is seeking to hire an H-1b professional.
H.R. 3736 would properly increase the cap on H-1b professionals.
However, the added attestations and Department of Labor-initiated investigation provisions will not benefit American businesses and universities.
It will not protect the American workforce; it will hurt the global competitiveness of American employers.
I am very concerned that in the end these added regulations may cost American jobs.
Thank you Mr. Chairman.
96 58001d.eps 58001e.eps Mr. ROGAN.
Thank you.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Let me say before I introduce the first panel, I want to thank the members who are here.
Mr. Pease, I mentioned in your absence a moment ago, you had taken a flight earlier than expected, just to be here today from Indiana.
We appreciate that.
Mr. Rogan had to come early from California, so I guess you get the record for the farthest distance traveled at some inconvenience as well.
Page 22 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. ROGAN.
But the weather is nicer here today.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Good.
Let me introduce our panelists and we will get to their testimony.
Dr. George Borjas, JFK School of Government at Harvard University; Dr. Georges Vernez, the RAND Corporation; and Alan Reynolds, the Hudson Institute.
You all know that I have a particular interest in the findings that you have made in various areas.
And I appreciate you being here and also the contribution you will be making today to the debate as to what we do about our future work force of America.
And let me say by introducing you all, also, that later on we will be hearing about H-1B high-tech workers.
I think we need to emphasize that the H-1Bs are just a tiny sliver of our overall work force numbers.
What you all will be talking about is the big picture, which of course includes the tiny sliver, but goes to the more important question of what are the future work force needs of America; what is the match or mismatch between our immigration policy and the needs of the work force.
And when I say the needs of the work force, of course, I am also talking about the needs of the economy, because if we are going to continue to have a growing economy, we are going to need to have a work force that I believe is more highly trained and more highly educated than the one we have today.
So welcome to you all.
Page 23 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Dr. Borjas, we will begin with you.
We won't say how many times you have been here, but welcome back.
STATEMENT OF GEORGE J. BORJAS, JOHN F. KENNEDY SCHOOL OF GOVERNMENT, HARVARD UNIVERSITY Mr. BORJAS.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
And thank you very much to the other members of the committee for having me back and for inviting me to talk a little bit about the latest research and economics, about economic impact and immigration on the United States.
As we all know, the U.S. is now on the verge of yet another historic debate over immigration policy.
Up to this point, the debate has focused primarily on illegal immigration and on welfare benefits received by immigrants, and as you all know, the discussions have led Congress to adopt several measures to address those problems.
I believe in the next few years, the immigration debate will likely shift toward a larger, much bigger picture of the character and consequence of legal immigration in the U.S.
One question that has historically driven the debate over legal immigration is question of what is economic impact on native workers of more immigrants.
That is what I want to talk about today.
Economic theory suggests that the effect of immigration on native workers depends critically on the distribution of skills between immigrants and natives.
If the skills of immigrants were similar to those of natives--in other words if, roughly speaking, the number of skilled immigrants was, roughly speaking, equal proportionately to the number of skilled natives and the number of unskilled immigrants was proportionately equal to the number of unskilled natives, then immigration would have little impact on the relative wage of skilled and unskilled workers on the economy.
Page 24 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
If, on the other hand, immigrants were more skilled than natives, we would expect the earnings of more skilled natives to fall because there would be an increase in supply of skilled natives and there would be a shift in income distribution toward the unskilled.
If, conversely, like has been the case over the last few years, immigrants were less skilled than natives, then there would be an increasing supply of less skilled workers overall and wages of less skilled workers would be expected to fall and the distribution of income would shift toward the more skilled.
The point is that any analysis of economic impact of immigration on labor market conditions will critically depend on a comparison of the skills of immigrants and the skills of native workers.
In data that is included in my written report, there is evidence that the skilled composition over the last 20 or 30 years of immigrants has been concentrated mostly toward the less skilled.
In other words, there has been a dramatic shift toward an increase in less skilled immigration over the last two or three decades and this shift in the distribution of skills is really responsible for what we are talking about later, which is the fact that there has been a pretty sizable impact on the wages of less skilled workers and an adverse impact on the wages of less skilled workers in the United States.
Now, how do economists try to measure that impact? Historically, immigrants have clustered in a very small number of States in the U.S.
In fact, in 1960, 60 percent of immigrants lived in 1 of 6 states: California, New York, Texas, Florida, New Jersey, and Illinois.
By 1990, the clustering has increased, so that 75 percent of immigrants live in those six States.
Page 25 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
This geographic clustering is the way that economists tend to exploit the data to address the question of whether immigrants affect native workers in the labor market.
In particular, the hypotheses goes something like this.
Suppose that immigrants really cluster in California to a large extent.
One would expect the natives in California will be somewhat better off or worse off, depending on the way things work, than natives in States where immigrants don't reside.
It is that cross-sectional or that spatial difference where immigrants cluster that really drives the empirical analysis of what kind of impact immigrants are having on native workers.
Practically all the literature searches people conduct, trying to measure the impact of immigration on native earnings, really is a comparison of native conditions.
In particular, cities like San Diego, for example, where there are many immigrants, versus cities like Pittsburgh, where there are very few immigrants.
And the assumption being if immigration is really adversely affecting native workers, one would expect the natives in San Diego are somewhat worse off than natives in Pittsburgh, and it is that comparison that motivates practically almost every empirical analysis in economics that looks at this problem.
The typical study in economics tends to find that, in fact, natives in San Diego are slightly worse off than natives in Pittsburgh.
But the correlation is so weak as to be almost trivial.
From that very weak negative correlation, most economists will tend to jump to the conclusion that because natives in San Diego are only slightly worse off than natives in Pittsburgh, that that must mean that immigration doesn't really have that big of an impact on the labor market.
Page 26 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
But I want to argue today that there are two major flaws with that conclusion and that there is a better way of doing things that is sort of the new wave in economic literature.
One crucial flaw with that conclusion is the fact immigrants, even though they cluster in six States, do not cluster randomly across the U.S.
They don't choose these States just out of pure draw of some random distribution.
Suppose, for example, that conditions in California tend to be quite good compared to the rest of the economy; because immigrants tends to cluster in California, that will tend to build a positive correlation between economics conditions and immigration, and it is just because of the fact immigrants happen to cluster in an unrandom way.
A more serious problem is the fact that immigrants, when they enter a State, are not acting in a vacuum, and by that I mean natives will not sit idly by and watch their opportunities evaporate.
Suppose, in particular, immigrants come to a city like San Diego and that they do have an adverse impact on the earnings of natives in San Diego.
Natives in San Diego will not just stand by and watch that happen; there will be several responses.
Number one, natives who are in San Diego now will now have a bigger incentive to move out of San Diego.
By moving out of San Diego, what that means is that whatever supply increase happened in San Diego will now be diffused throughout the whole country, and therefore some of the economic impact of immigration will now also happen in Pittsburgh, where natives will move.
Another way in which natives respond is that natives who are thinking of moving to San Diego will now move someplace else instead, and again that tends to diffuse the economic impact of immigration from San Diego to the rest of the economy.
Page 27 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
And last but not least, people who are thinking of investing money and opening up firms will look at opportunities in various cities, and when they see immigrants flooding San Diego and lowering the unskilled wage there, if one is thinking about opening up a factory that uses those workers, then one will the capital flows to compensate also; and again the capital flows will leave Detroit, for example, and move to San Diego, and again equalize economic opportunities across the whole country.
The point is that negative responses will tend to diffuse the impact of immigration away from the city most affected by immigration toward the whole economy.
The key point is that because of that, one cannot look at a particular labor market like San Diego, for example, or California, to conclude anything about the economic impact of immigration.
In the written testimony that I provided to the committee, there is some evidence that in fact there are these kinds of flows going on in the economy and perhaps the clearest evidence of a potential relationship between native migration flows within the U.S. and immigration is what has happened to California's population in the last 30, 40, 50 years.
Prior to 1970--let me rephrase that.
California has been growing very rapidly in terms of population throughout the whole century.
Prior to 1970, the number of natives living in California was growing quite rapidly, and if I just read a couple numbers to you, I hate to flood you with numbers but these numbers are sort of interesting.
Prior to 1970--let me rephrase that again.
6.9 percent of the native population in the U.S. was living in California in 1950.
By 1970, almost 10 percent of natives were living in California--of the entire U.S., was living in California.
It turns that out even though California's population has grown continuously since then, the fraction of natives living in California has remained steady at about 10 percent since 1970, yet California's population has grown continuously since then.
Page 28 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In 1970, 10.2 percent of the population lived in California.
By 1990, 12.4 percent lived in California.
One way of interpreting the data is the following.
Suppose we go back in time to 1970 and I ask you to predict California's share of the population today.
Even though you know nothing about the fact millions of immigrants will be moving to California between 1970 and 1998, you could actually do a very good job of predicting California's population today from pre-1970 trends.
One way of interpreting that is the trend essentially continued but the growth in population was essentially replaced on a one-to-one basis by immigrants moving into California.
Now, there are two ways of interpreting that empirical fact.
One is for any immigrant that came into California, one native did not move there that would have moved there given the previous trend.
The other possibility is for reasons we don't understand, California's population growth would have stopped in 1970, and had it not been for immigration, California today would be a much smaller State.
We clearly cannot know which counter fact of history is correct, we only know what actually happened.
But preexisting trends in California clearly indicate very rapid population growth, which essentially stopped the minute that the immigrants---- Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Dr. Borjas, that has been a very quick 5 minutes, I agree.
I would like to hear from you myself for hours.
Page 29 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. BORJAS.
Let me conclude.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Yes, move on.
And we will have some questions for you.
Mr. BORJAS.
Just 30 more seconds.
What that means is we cannot really look at labor markets to measure the economic impact of immigration.
We have to look at the national economy.
And recent research that does that shows that because the supply of immigrants tends to disproportionately increase the supply of less skilled workers, immigration has had a very sizable impact on the skilled and unskilled wage.
And, in particular, immigration over the 1980 through 1995 period can account for almost half of the decrease in the relative wage of high school dropouts in this country.
Thank you.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Dr. Borjas.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Borjas follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF GEORGE J. BORJAS(see footnote 1), John F. Kennedy School of Government, Harvard University The United States is on the verge of yet another historic debate over immigration policy.
Up to this point, the debate has focused primarily on illegal immigration or on welfare benefits received by immigrants--and these discussions have led Congress to tighten restrictions on illegal aliens and to change the eligibility requirements for welfare use by non-citizens.
Page 30 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In the next few years, the debate will likely shift towards the larger and much more important issue of the character and consequences of legal immigration.
There have been two major shifts in legal immigration policy in this century.
In 1924, the United States began to limit the number of immigrants admitted and established the national-origins quota system, a visa-allocation scheme that awarded entry visas mainly on the basis of national origin and that favored Germany and the United Kingdom.
This system was repealed in 1965, and family reunification became the central goal of immigration policy, with entry visas being awarded mainly to applicants who have relatives already residing in the United States.
The social, demographic, and economic changes initiated by the 1965 legislation have been truly historic.
Immigration began to surge soon after the enactment of the 1965 Amendments, reversing a long downward trend in the foreign-born share of the U.S. population.
As recently as the 1950s, only about 250 thousand immigrants entered the country annually; by the 1990s, the United States was admitting about 1 million legal immigrants annually, and an estimated 300 thousand aliens entered and stayed in the country illegally.
In 1970, the foreign-born share of the U.S. population was 4.8 percent.
By 1996, the foreign-born share had increased to 9.3 percent.
Moreover, because of the decline in the number of children borne by American women, immigration now accounts for nearly 40 percent of the growth in population, as compared to about 50 percent at the beginning of the 20th Century.
At least one of every three new workers who will enter the U.S. labor market during the 1990s will be an immigrant.
By this yardstick, immigrants play a crucial role in determining demographic and economic trends in the United States.
Page 31 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The 1965 legislation also led to a momentous shift in the ethnic composition of the population.
Although persons of European origin dominated the immigrant flow since the country's founding until the 1950's, only about 10 percent of the persons admitted in the 1980's were of European origin.
It is now estimated that non-Hispanic whites may form a minority of the population by the year 2050.
The effect of immigration on native labor depends critically on the distribution of skills between immigrants and natives.
If the skill distribution of immigrants matched that of natives, immigration would not affect the relative supply of skills and thus would have little, if any, impact on the wage structure.
If immigrants were less skilled than natives, we would expect the earnings of less skilled workers to fall, and immigration would shift the distribution of income toward the more skilled.
Finally, if immigrants were more skilled than natives, we would expect the earnings of ore skilled workers to fall, and immigration would shift the distribution of income towards the less skilled.
Any analysis of the economic impact of immigration on native labor market opportunities, therefore, must begin by describing how the skills of immigrants compare to those of natives.
Table uses data drawn from the decennial Censuses to summarize the key trends in immigrant skills over the 1970-90 period.
The relative educational attainment of successive immigrant waves fell dramatically in recent decades.
In 1970, the typical immigrant in the country had 10.7 years of schooling, as compared to 11.5 years for the typical native worker.
By 1990, the typical immigrant had 11.6 years of schooling, as compared to 13.2 years for natives.
The relative decline in the education of immigrants is partly responsible for a substantial increase in the wage gap between immigrants and natives.
In 1970, the typical immigrant earned about 1 percent more than natives; by 1990, the typical immigrant earned 15.2 percent less than natives.
Page 32 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The table also documents that part of the decline in the relative economic performance of immigrants can be explained by a sizable drop in the relative wage of successive immigrant cohorts.
The latest immigrant wave enumerated in the 1970 Census (i.e., the 1965-1969 arrivals) earned 16.6 percent less than natives in 1970.
By 1980, the latest immigrant wave enumerated in the 1980 Census earned 27.6 percent less than natives; and by 1990, the wage disadvantage between the most recent immigrant wave and natives had grown to 31.7 percent.
As long as we are willing to interpret relative wages as a measure of relative skills, the trend in the wage differential between recent immigrants and natives suggests that there was a rapid decline in the relative skills of immigrants during the 1970-90 period.
The available evidence also suggests that the economic gap between immigrants and natives does not narrow substantially during the immigrants' working lives.
Figure illustrates the trend in the wage differential between a particular group of immigrants and similarly-aged natives, so that immigrants who arrived when they were between 25 and 34 years old in the late 1960s are compared to natives aged 25-34 in 1970, to natives 35-44 in 1980, and to natives aged 45-54 in 1990.
Consider the group of immigrants who arrived between 1965 and 1969 and who were 25-34 years old in 1970.
They earned 12.0 percent less than natives in 1970 and 2.5 percent less in 1990.
Over a 20-year period, therefore, the relative wage of this immigrant cohort increased by 10 percentage points.
It turns out that practically all immigrants, regardless of when they arrived in the country, experience the same sluggish relative wage growth.
This result is significant because it suggests that more recent immigrant cohorts have not had faster wage growth despite their lower starting positions.
Immigrants who arrived between 1975 and 1979 and were 25-34 years old at the time of arrival earned 21.3 percent less than natives in 1980 and 15.5 percent less than natives in 1990, an increase of only 5.8 percentage points.
This wage growth is similar to that experienced by similarly aged immigrants who arrived between 1965 and 1969.
Page 33 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In short, the process of economic assimilation narrows the wage gap between immigrants and natives by only about 10 percentage points in the first two decades after arrival.
If the recent waves experience the same extent of economic assimilation as earlier waves, the wage gap between recent immigrants and natives will remain at about 20 percentage points throughout much of the immigrants' working lives.
The implication for the economic impact of immigration is clear: current immigration will have a disproportionately large impact on the number of less skilled workers for the next few decades.
Historically, immigrants have clustered in a small number of geographic areas, and this geographic concentration has increased over time.
In 1960, 60 percent of the immigrants lived in one of the six main ''immigrant-receiving'' states--California, New York, Texas, Florida, New Jersey and Illinois.
By 1990, 75 percent of immigrants lived in these states, and 33 percent lived in California alone.
This geographic clustering occurs because immigrants tend to enter the country through a very small number of gateway cities, and the empirical evidence suggests that many immigrants are unlikely to move to other parts of the country as part of the assimilation process.
Figure illustrates the impact of immigration on the percentage of the adult population that is foreign-born in California, in other immigrant-receiving states, and in the rest of the country.
Prior to 1970, the foreign-born share was steady or declining in each region.
Since 1970, this share almost tripled in California (rising from 10.3 percent in 1970 to 26.8 percent in 1990), roughly doubled in the other immigrant-receiving states (from 8.4 to 14.6 percent), and rose slightly in the rest of the country (from 3.0 to 4.2 percent).
Much of the academic research that attempts to measure the economic impact of immigration on native employment opportunities exploits the geographic clustering of the immigrant population in the United States.
The idea can be roughly stated as follows: we know that immigrants flock to California.
Why not just compare California's labor market outcomes to the outcomes observed in the rest of the country? This approach is, in fact, the approach used in much of the academic literature that attempts to measure the impact of immigration on native labor market opportunities.
Page 34 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Beginning in the early 1980s, a growing number of econometric studies began to estimate the impact of immigration on native earnings by comparing the earnings of natives who reside in immigrant cities (such as Los Angeles and San Diego) with the earnings of natives who reside in cities where few immigrants live (such as Atlanta and Pittsburgh).
These ''spatial correlations'' suggested that the average native wage is only slightly lower in labor markets where immigrants tend to cluster.
If one city has 10 percent more immigrants than another, the native wage in the city with more immigrants is only about .2 percent lower.
The econometric studies then jumped to the conclusion that the weak spatial correlation must indicate that immigration has little impact on the economic opportunities of native workers.
There are, however, two problems with the spatial correlation approach.
Suppose, for example, that immigration into California lowers the earnings of natives in California substantially.
Native workers are not likely to stand idly by and watch their economic opportunities evaporate.
Many will move out of California into other regions, and persons who were considering moving to California will now move somewhere else instead.
As native workers respond to immigration by voting with their feet, the adverse impact of immigration on California's labor market is transmitted to the entire economy.
In the end, all native workers are worse off from immigration, not simply those residing in the areas where immigrants cluster.
Moreover, natives might respond not only in terms of labor flows, but also through capital flows.
If immigration reduces the wage of less skilled workers in the immigrant-receiving areas, entrepreneurs will take this into account when making their investment decisions and move some of their capital to these areas.
Again, these capital flows tend to equalize economic opportunities across areas.
Page 35 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Therefore, native responses to immigration--whether through labor flows or capital flows--tend to diffuse the economic impact of immigration away from the affected areas and towards the national economy.
As a result, a weak spatial correlation does not necessarily indicate that immigrants have a numerically inconsequential impact on native workers.
In addition, immigrants do not cluster randomly across the United States.
Cities or states where immigrants cluster have done well in some periods and poorly in others, producing a ''spurious'' correlation between immigration and area outcomes.
For reasons that are probably unrelated to immigration, California is a high wage state.
As a result, it will look as if immigration improves native economic opportunities in a cross-section dominated by California.
To avoid this spurious cross-section ''spatial'' correlation, most analysts relate changes in the economic position of natives in an area over time to changes in the number of immigrants.
But a state's economy also fluctuates over time for reasons that are independent of immigration, creating the possibility of spurious longitudinal correlations as well.
When California's economy booms (or falls into a recession), there will be a positive (negative) correlation between immigration and the economic position of natives.
Recent work by Harvard economists George Borjas, Richard Freeman, and Lawrence Katz provides what is perhaps the clearest evidence of a potential relation between immigration and native migration decisions in the United States.(see footnote 2) Divide the country into three ''regions'': California, the other five states that receive large numbers of immigrants (New York, Texas, Florida, New Jersey, and Illinois), and the remainder of the country.
Table reports the proportion of the total population, of natives, and of immigrants living in these areas from 1950 to 1990.
The resurgence of large-scale immigration into the United States began around 1970 and has continued since.
It seems natural to contrast pre-1970 changes in the residential location of the native population with post-1970 changes to assess the effects of immigration on native location decisions.
Page 36 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The population counts reveal that the share of natives who lived in the major immigrant receiving state, California, was rising rapidly prior to 1970.
Since 1970, however, the share of natives living in California has barely changed.
However, California's share of the total population kept rising from 10.2 percent in 1970 to 12.4 percent in 1990.
Put differently, an extrapolation of the demographic trends that existed before 1970--before the immigrant supply shock--would have predicted the state's 1990 share of the total population quite well.
Because labor (or capital) flows can diffuse the impact of immigration from the affected local labor markets to the national economy, Borjas, Freeman, and Katz proposed an alternative methodology to estimate the impact.
The ''factor proportions approach'' compares a nation's actual supplies of workers in particular skill groups to those it would had had in the absence of immigration, and then uses outside information on how the wages of particular skill groups respond to increases in supply to compute the relative wage consequences of immigration.
The immigrant supply shock that occurred between 1980 and 1995 increased the supply of workers without a high school diploma by 20.7 percent.
At the same time, this immigrant supply shock increased the supply of workers with at least a college diploma by only 4.1 percent.
It has been estimated that the disproportionate impact of immigration on the supply of less-skilled workers can explain about 44 percent of the 10.9 percentage point decline in the relative wage of high school dropouts observed between 1980 and 1995.
This perspective thus implies that the adverse impact of immigration on the well being of workers at the bottom end of the skill distribution has been substantial.
Table 1
Page 37 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Source: Borjas (1995, Table 1).
The statistics are calculated in the subsample of men aged 25-64 who work in the civilian sector, who are not self-employed, and who do not reside in group quarters.
58001a.eps 58001b.eps
Source: Borjas, Freeman, and Katz (1997, Figure 1).
The calculations use the 1950-90 U.S. Censuses.
The adult-age population contains all persons aged 18-64 who are not living in group quarters.
Table 2
Table 3
Table 4
Source: Borjas, Freeman, and Katz (1997, Table 8).
The calculations use the 1950-90 U.S. Censuses.
The adult-age population contains all persons aged 18-64 who are not living in group quarters.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Dr. Vernez.
Page 38 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
STATEMENT OF GEORGES VERNEZ, DIRECTOR, CENTER FOR RESEARCH ON IMMIGRATION POLICY, RAND Mr. VERNEZ.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
As you know, my colleague Kevin McCarthy and I have just completed a comprehensive analysis of the effect of immigration in the State of California over the past 30 years; in fact, doing what Dr. Borjas said shouldn't be done.
Certainly California is a unique State as far as immigration is concerned.
It has about one-third of all immigrants residing in the United States, and those immigrants, relative to the rest of the nations, are much more likely to come from Mexico, Latin America, and Southeast Asia, and have a much lower level of education.
Hence, I think the California experience is very relevant to the topic of this hearing.
We have concluded from our analyses that immigration continues to benefit California's employers in the economy at large.
It is doing so at increasing cost to low-educated workers, both natives and foreign borns, and to the public sector.
One major reason is a widening gap between the State's economic needs and the skill levels of immigrants.
Let me elaborate briefly on these points: Immigration benefits employers in the economy at large because immigrant labor, particularly low-skilled labor, is less expensive than native-born labor and is equally productive.
As a result, immigrants have provided California employers with a comparative advantage within the United States, everything else being equal.
Page 39 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
On the down side, however, the employment prospects and wages of less-educated workers have dropped steadily because a greater number of workers, both native born and foreign born, are competing for a fixed number of jobs.
The California economy created 7 million jobs between 1960 and 1990.
Eighty-five percent were filled by workers with one or more years of college, and 15 percent were filled by workers with only a high school degree.
There has been no job growth in the number of jobs filled by workers with less than 12 years of education during that period of time.
High school dropouts have been most affected by these trends.
The employment rate, for instance, among these workers fell from 67 percent in 1970 to 47 percent in 1990.
Now, clearly, the main reasons for this decline are increased worldwide competition, technological advances, and the availability of cheap labor in developing countries.
Immigration to the State has also been a factor, however.
We have estimated that immigration has contributed 15 to 25 percent of this decline.
Immigration also has had a downward effect on the wages of unskilled workers.
Between 1970 and 1990, real wages of native-born high school dropouts declined by 24 percent in California, with about one-tenth of the decline attributable to immigration.
Immigrants themselves have also been affected.
The typical image of an immigrant is that he enters the country at a wage that is slightly below a native-born and, over time, within 10 years, catches up and reaches parity with native-borns in terms of wages.
That is still true for educated immigrants, particularly college-educated immigrants.
Page 40 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
It is no longer true, if it has ever been true, for low-educated immigrants.
They enter commanding relatively low wage and they make no economic progress over their lifetimes.
In other words, a large portion of those immigrants, which are about 50 percent of all immigrants in California, will live in poverty throughout their lives at very low wages.
These trends which have contributed also to immigration, have a growing effect on the demand for State and local government services and public institutions.
Schools have been the hardest hit by immigration.
Because immigrants in California are young and have fertility rates that are about 30 to 40 percent higher than native-born residents, their presence in the State has contributed to a 33 percent K-12 enrollment from 1986 to 1996.
The full effect of this increase has not yet been fully felt in high school, community colleges, and the university systems.
We have projected a 30 to 40 percent increase in the size of the high school graduating class between 1995 and the year 2005.
In less than 10 years, the system will have to grow by about 30 percent if it is to accommodate this growth in the number of students, or otherwise deny a post secondary education to an increasing proportion of California youths.
This educational challenge is all the greater because a large proportion of these children, predominately Hispanic and southeast Asians, are being raised in low-income families in which both parents have less than a high school education.
Research very often is contradictory on many things, but on one thing research has always been consistent; that is, there is a very high correlation between the education of the parents and the resources of the parents and the eventual educational attainment of their children.
Page 41 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Today, for instance, native-born Hispanic youths are 30 percent less likely to go to college after high school and three times less likely to graduate from college than a non-Hispanic-white student.
Why is that significant? Because Hispanic students now account for 40 percent of the entry class into school in California and about 15 percent in the Nation and therefore will have a strong bearing on the quality of the future labor force.
Let me conclude with two suggestions.
Two of the most important recommendations contained in our report proposes changes in immigration policy and education policy.
One minute? Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Dr. Vernez, maybe I will follow up with my first question to you on that point.
Thank you very much.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Vernez follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF GEORGES VERNEZ(see footnote 3), Director, Center for Research on Immigration Policy, RAND Mr. Chairman and members of the House Subcommittee on Immigration and Claims, thank you for the opportunity to testify on Immigration and America's Workforce for the 21st Century.
Page 42 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
My colleague, Kevin McCarthy, and I have just completed an analysis of immigration in the state of California between 1960 and 1990.
Our findings, documented in Immigration in a Changing Economy: California's Experience, are particularly relevant to the topic of this hearing.(see footnote 4) As you probably know, about one-third of all foreign-born people in the nation now reside in California.
Along with their children, they account for two-thirds of the state's population growth since 1980.
Relative to the rest of the nation, immigrants to California are more likely to come from Mexico, Latin America, and Southeast Asia.
Compared to the rest of the nation, they are less likely to have completed high school.
In fact, nearly half the immigrants to the state have less than 12 years of schooling.
As these immigrants enter a state economy that is increasingly skill-based, the costs to the public sector are getting steeper.
The state must educate an increasing number of children born to immigrants and keep them in the education system long enough to provide them the skills required by most jobs.
In short, the widening gap between the needs of the state's economy and the skill levels of incoming immigrants places a heavy burden on the education system.
Furthermore, increasing numbers of low-skilled immigrants are competing with native and foreign-born workers for low-skilled jobs, a sector that has not grown in the last 30 years.
Our study concludes that the benefits of immigration to the state continue to outweigh the costs.
However, unless immigration policy changes and unless greater investment is made in the education of the children of immigrants who are already residents of the state, the costs of immigration will increase.
Page 43 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The remainder of my testimony elaborates on these points.
On the benefit side, in the past 30 years immigration has helped California's economy grow about 15 percentage points faster than that of the rest of the nation.
The main reason for this accelerated growth is that immigrant labor--particularly low-skilled labor--is less expensive than native-born labor and is equally productive.
As a result, immigrants have provided California's employers with a comparative advantage over their competitors in other states.
On the cost side, however, the employment prospects and wages of less-educated workers have dropped steadily because a greater number of workers--both native-born and foreign-born--are competing for a fixed number of jobs.
Of the 7 million new jobs created in California from 1960 to 1990, 85 percent were filled by workers with one or more years of college and 15 percent were filled by workers with only a high school degree.(see footnote 5) Since there has been no job growth in the unskilled sector, less-educated newcomers are now taking jobs vacated by retirees or by workers moving out of the state.
These immigrants are also taking jobs from native-born high school dropouts.
The employment rate among these workers fell from 67 percent in 1970 to 47 percent in 1990.
Although the main reasons for this decline are increased world-wide competition, technological advances, and the availability of cheap labor in developing countries, immigration to the state has also been a factor.
We estimate that immigration has caused 15 to 25 percent of this decline.
Employment among high school graduates has also declined, although not as sharply.
Page 44 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Overall, between 1960 and 1990, we estimate that between 130,000 to 190,000 native-born people were not working as a result of immigration.
This figure represents about 3 to 5 percent of all those unemployed or out of the labor force.
Immigration has also had a downward effect on the wages of unskilled workers.
Between 1970 and 1990, the real wages of native-born high school dropouts declined by 24 percent in California, with about one-tenth of this decline attributable to immigration.
Foreign-born workers have also suffered wage erosion.
They receive increasingly lower earnings relative to native-born workers when they arrive, and they actually lose earning power over their lifetime.
Unlike immigrants with some college education, who reach earning parity with the average native-born worker in the state within about 10 years, immigrants with less than a high school degree (about half the state's immigrants) fall increasingly behind the average native-born worker during their working lives.
These trends have contributed to immigration's growing effect on the demand for state and local government services.
The costs of immigration to the state's public sector have been well documented in a recent report from the National Research Council.(see footnote 6) The report estimates that in 1996 the net annual public costs for state and local services were $3,463 per immigrant household.
That amounts to an annual tax burden of $1,170 per native-born California household.
The reason for this high cost to the California taxpayer is not that immigrants are greater users of public services than natives with similar income and family composition: It is simply that a greater share of immigrants have low incomes and large families.
Of all public institutions, schools have been the hardest hit by immigration.
Because immigrants to California are young and have fertility rates that are 30 to 40 percent higher than native-born residents, their presence in the state has contributed to a 33 percent growth in K-12 enrollment from 1986 to 1996 (from 4.4 million to 5.8 million).
Page 45 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The full effect of this increase has yet to be felt on the state's high schools, community colleges, and universities.
We have projected a 30 to 40 percent increase in the size of the high school graduating class between 1995 and 2005.
Even a substantial decline in immigration between now and then would have little effect in this growth rate.
Most of the students in the senior class of 2005 are already in the state's school system.
This educational challenge is all the greater because a large proportion of these children--predominately Hispanic and Southeast Asian--are being raised in low-income families in which both parents have less than a high school education.
Research consistently shows that although the children in such families will be more educated than their parents, they will lag well behind other students, particularly in college attendance.
Today, for instance, native-born Hispanic youths are 30 percent less likely to go on to college after high school and three times less likely to graduate from college than non-Hispanic white students.
Considering that by the year 2005, Hispanic youths alone will constitute 40 percent of all high school students in California--and more than 15 percent in the nation--their prospects will have a strong bearing on the quality of the future labor force.
In our report, we make a number of recommendations to address these trends, at both the federal and state levels.
Two of the most important recommendations propose changes in immigration policy and education policy.
With regard to federal immigration policy, we do not recommend a radical overhaul.
But to address the stagnation of job opportunities by low-skilled labor, we suggest two incremental changes.
First, the number of legal immigrants admitted to the United States should be reduced to a more moderate range--which means somewhere between 300,000 per year, the average during the 1970s, and 800,000 per year, the average during the 1990s.
Second, we propose that a better balance should be found between the demands of family reunification and the demands for higher-skilled labor in the workplace.
Page 46 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
With respect to education policy, it must be recognized that a disproportionate share of the children of immigrants, most of whom are born in the United States, are concentrated in a handful of states.
Significant resources in investments for education will have to be made in those states just to keep up with increasing enrollments.
But more than that is required: States should support special programs to encourage high school graduation and college attendance, particularly within the Hispanic community, and to enhance the English proficiency of immigrants and their children who already reside in the state.
These recommendations imply that a better balance should be struck between the interests of those who are already here, both native and foreign-born, and those who are seeking to come to the United States.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Mr. Reynolds.
STATEMENT OF ALAN REYNOLDS, DIRECTOR OF ECONOMIC RESEARCH, HUDSON INSTITUTE Mr. REYNOLDS.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Since you were kind enough to set a precedent by quoting from the Hudson Institute study, ''Work Force 2020,'' I am going to begin by doing the same.
In the 1990's, immigration accounted for fully half of the increase in the labor force.
Immigration policy remains unchanged.
Immigrants will constitute an increasing share of workers in the early 21st century.
Thus, the job qualifications of immigrants will have an increasingly important impact on the skill and education levels of the work force.
Page 47 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Unless they acquire more schooling in the U.S. than they did in their native countries, which parenthetically implies a burden on the taxpayer, recent immigrants will account for a rising share of the otherwise dwindling number of Americans who lack a high school education.
Now the reason that immigrants accounted for about half of the growth of the labor force in the early nineties was not that immigration accelerated but, rather, that the labor force has slowed down from about 1.7 percent, a little less in the eighties, to about 1.1 percent in the nineties.
And given the slowdown in the labor force and the aging of the labor force, one could make a case for large numbers of immigrants--that there would be some benefits from large numbers of immigrants; but the key question, of course, is even if you were running short of willing and able workers, the key question is ''able,'' and that is where this panel, I think, is in total agreement.
As it comes time to add more workers or to replace retiring workers with young people, immigration becomes extremely important at the margin and this adds up to quite a few numbers as 10 or 20 years pass.
The average skill level of U.S. workers' productivity, average real wages, may well be diluted in the future if too many immigrants come here with below-average skills and are ill-prepared to improve those skills in a rapidly changing economy.
The second point related to that is that an increased supply of unskilled immigrants must depress real wages for unskilled natives unless there was matching increase in capital formation in low-wage industries.
I find that extremely unlikely.
I don't think capital is going to flow into sweat shops and broom-making and industries of that sort, nor do I think that is desirable.
So in that case, an increase in supply of unskilled labor with capital being the same means the capital-labor ratio falls; real wages for productivity fall too, which is simply another way of saying I agree completely with Dr. Borjas.
Page 48 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Up until 1965, from 1924 to 1965, immigration policy was rationed according to country of origin and this was thought to be unfair and irrational.
But, in practice, current policy still does that and it does that because the previous wave of immigrants bring in their relatives, so there is the importance of relatives in our immigration priorities.
The percentage of immigrants in the family-sponsored category was 63.9 in 1995, 65.1 percent in 1996.
And that means de facto immigration quotas are heavily biased in favor of aspiring immigrants from Mexico, the former Soviet Union, the Philippines, Vietnam, Dominican Republic, El Salvador, China, India, and Cuba.
Recent immigrants from these countries bring in their relatives and their relatives then sponsor more relatives, so we end up with a country-based system, inadvertently; which Congress attempted to patch with diversity quotas, but that really isn't working.
With the family sponsorship, the diversity--the 55,000 for diversity and the lottery, refugees and asylees, are using up at least 85 percent of available slots, which doesn't leave much room for any other criteria, such as employment prospects.
The 1990 law permits up to 140,000 employment-based immigrants a year, but actual figures have been much lower, about 85,000 in 1995 and 117,000 in 1996, really trivial numbers.
Moreover, the work-related visas are usually temporary, while the much larger numbers of immigrants admitted for other reasons are permanent.
Page 49 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The dominant criteria for U.S. immigration quotas--which are having a relative here, coming from a really terrible country, or winning a diversity lottery--those criteria are obviously unrelated to any concept of what is good for the U.S. economy or society.
No one would sit down and say these are what we would begin with if we were starting fresh.
Instead, the prevailing criteria are limited to just two, among many, conceivable interests of the immigrants themselves.
Immigration policy is all about methods and criteria of rationing a relatively small number of spaces among a much larger number of people who would like to live in the United States.
It is a rationing question.
And there are only four possible rationing methods.
One is the queue, waiting in line; first come, first served.
Another is the lottery.
Another is allocation by political or bureaucratic preference, putting people into categories and having import quotas on categories.
The last is the price system.
Current policy mainly relies on the queue.
Foreigners who are offered a job with less than 2 years of experience are in the employment third preference class and must wait 10 years.
Bringing in an unmarried child over the age of 21 has a 6-year wait and so on.
Instead of relying on these arbitrary import quotas and waiting lists, I propose to make somewhat more use of the price system, as Canada does, by requiring a modest immigration fee.
Canada's is 975 Canadian dollars.
That would tend to reduce the waiting list by weeding out marginal applicants with a weak commitment to this country.
As far as illegal immigration, half of the problem is due to overstaying legal visas.
I proposed system fines that would grow geometrically larger, the longer the overstay was overdue.
For example, doubled every month.
Anyone could leave without paying the fine but they couldn't come back in.
Page 50 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Anyway, the bottom line is we must rely on some criteria for determining an immigrant's eligibility, and I suggest the most sensible and ultimately most humane criteria are those that demonstrate the potential immigrant's ability to support himself or herself and their family.
And that would include things like formal education, occupational experience, training or other skills, certainly including English language skills, and accumulated savings.
A constructive and compassionate immigration policy must put primary emphasis on making sure that new entrants have sufficient human capital or financial capital to become, in a reasonable length of time, productive members of the economy and society.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Reynolds follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALAN REYNOLDS, DIRECTOR OF ECONOMIC RESEARCH, HUDSON INSTITUTE Last year, the Hudson Institute published Workforce 2020, the sequel to Workforce 2000.
I did the background research on immigration for this project, and contributed some sections of the report.
Unlike Workforce 2000 (which was commissioned by the Department of Labor), Workforce 2020 was privately funded.
My own research has been entirely privately funded.
The views I express here are my own, not those of my employer or associates.
Let me begin by quoting a representative passage from the new Hudson study: Page 51 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In the 1990s, immigration accounted for fully half of the increase in the labor force; if immigration policy remains unchanged, immigrants will constitute an increasing share of workers in the early twenty-first century.
Thus the job qualifications of immigrants will have an increasingly important impact on the skill and education levels of the workforce.
Unless they acquire more schooling in the U.S. than they did in their native countries, recent immigrants will account for a rising share of the otherwise dwindling number of Americans who lack a high school education.
Immigration is not inherently good or bad.
Given the slowing and aging of the population, a plausible argument could be made that the U.S. might benefit from more rapid increases in the number of working-age immigrants than we have experienced in recent years.
There would be more people paying Social Security taxes, for example.
In my view, the most important immigration issue is not whether the numbers of immigrants should be larger or smaller, but whether or not U.S. policy can prudently continue to be indifferent about inviting huge numbers of permanent residents who lack basic education or language skills.
A few preliminary observations: 1.
Growth of the U.S. labor force has already slowed dramatically (from more than 1.6% a year in the 1980s to about 1.1% in the 1990s) and is apt to slow further if tax and transfer policies are not redesigned to improve work incentives for older Americans and second earners.
We are running short of willing and able workers.
This is likely to be a chronic problem for the foreseeable future.
Slow growth of the labor force explains why estimates of future economic growth are closer to 2% than to the 3% norm of the postwar era.
Page 52 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
2.
Immigration accounted for half of all new additions to the labor force in the first half of this decade.
At the margin, when it comes time to add more workers, or to replace retiring workers with young people, immigrants will be increasingly important.
The average skill level of U.S. workers, productivity and real wages, may be diluted in the future if too many immigrants bring below-average skills to the job, and are ill-prepared to improve those skills to keep up with the economy's rapid changes.
3.
Census assumptions that the sum of legal and illegal immigration can forever be held below 900,000 a year seem unrealistic.
External pressures on the borders are not getting any lighter.
The population of Asia alone is expected to grow by one billion people by the year 2020, and the population of Latin America and the Caribbean by 155 million.
4.
An increased supply of unskilled immigrant workers must depress real wages for unskilled natives unless that increased supply of unskilled labor was matched by increased investment in businesses that make use of unskilled workers.
Shifting scarce capital toward low-wage industries is quite unlikely to happen, and it would be wasteful if it did.
5.
Concerns about a ''shortage'' of high-tech employees are misleading.
If certain skills become very scarce relative to demand, then salary offers for those jobs will increase--enticing more people to acquire these skills.
A better way of putting the issue is that if immigration policy shifted toward putting greater emphasis on immigrants' skills, then skill-based wage differentials would narrow--unskilled jobs would then pay more, and skilled work a bit less.
Under current policy, the opposite outcome is more likely, and more troublesome.
Page 53 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
6.
Under current law, the schooling or skill of legal immigrants is almost 90% a matter of random luck.
Two-thirds of immigrants are admitted solely because they have family members living in the United States, and another 16% are refugees or asylees, and 5-6% win the ''diversity'' lottery.
Employment-related criteria have accounted for no more than 13% of immigrants lately, and that figures overstates the true significance of employability due to double counting.
Employment-related visas are limited to 140,000, but have been smaller.
Work-related visas are often temporary, while the much larger numbers of immigrants admitted regardless of employability are permanent.
CURRENT POLICY From 1924 to 1965, immigration was rationed according to country of origin.
In practice, current policy still does that.
This is because the previous wave of immigrants has extremely preferential treatment when it comes to bringing in more relatives from the same countries.
The more immigrants who arrived from a certain country in the recent past, the more can be expected from that country in the near future.
From 1990 to 1995, new immigration (aside from legalization under amnesty) averaged about 737,000 a year.
Of those, immediate relatives accounted for 238,242 immigrants a year, and family-sponsored relatives accounted for another 220,103.
That is, nearly two-thirds (62.2 %) of immigrants were admitted solely because they had family members here.
This percentage of immigrants in family-sponsored categories has been rising lately--to 63.9% in 1995 and 65.1% in 1996.
Another 16% of immigrants in the first half of the nineties (119,000 a year) were refugees and asylees--mainly from former communist countries: the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe, Vietnam, Laos and Cuba.
Page 54 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
We have inadvertently restored the old system of favoring immigrants depending on country of origin.
But the new favoritism is no longer for immigrants from democratic countries with high levels of prosperity and skill, but for immigrants from the same countries that accounted for the last group of immigrants.
This means de facto immigration quotas are heavily biased in favor of aspiring immigrants from Mexico, the former Soviet Union, the Philippines, Vietnam, the Dominican Republic, El Salvador, China, India and Cuba.
Recent immigrants from these countries bring in their relatives.
And their newly arrived relatives, in turn, sponsor still more relatives from the same countries.
To patch this problem, Congress added ''diversity'' quotas.
The rationing dilemma in this case is so extreme that a lottery is used, with odds not much better than other lotteries.
In one 30-day period (ending March 12, 1996), some 6.5 million applications were reportedly received for these 55,000 diversity visas.
With family sponsorship, diversity and refugees using up at least 85% of the available spaces, that does not leave much room for any other criteria, such as employment prospects or investment.
The 1990 law permits up to 140,000 employment-based immigrants a year, but the actual figures were only 85,336 in 1995 and 117,499 in 1996.
Highly restrictive investment-based criteria (called ''employment creation '') have admitted only about 500 people each year.
The dominant criteria for U.S. immigration quotas--having a relative here, coming from a really terrible country, or winning the diversity lottery--are obviously unrelated to any concept of what is good for the U.S. economy or society.
Instead, the prevailing criteria are limited to just two (among many) conceivable interests of the immigrants themselves namely, escaping from a politically repressive country, or being able to live closer to other family members.
Unless Congress is willing to increase the numbers of legal immigrants, any decision to put greater emphasis on employment qualifications requires putting less emphasis on family ties and/or refugee status.
If the numbers are limited, there is no choice but to make choices.
Page 55 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
HOW OTHERS DO IT The percentage of foreign-born residents in Canada is twice as high as it is in the U.S.
Yet Canada puts a much higher priority on economic criteria (employability and assets) than the U.S. does, and is also contemplating adding a very strict language requirement.
Only half of Canada's immigrants fall into the family reunification category that so dominates U.S. policy, and Canada appears somewhat more strict about refugee qualifications.
Canadian immigrants need 70 out of 100 points.
As many as 15 points can be awarded for knowledge of English or French, with another 15 points possible for specific vocational preparation.
Education earns up to 12 points.
Experience counts for 8 points if the applicant has a job in Canada, which is itself worth another 10-20 points depending on the occupation.
Personal suitability and other miscellany make up the balance.
An immigration who arrives with a half a million Canadian dollars is rightly considered unlikely to end up dependent on welfare, for example, regardless how those assets are invested.
There are also immigration categories for entrepreneurs, the self-employed and investors.
Canada also makes limited use of the price system to help balance supply and demand.
There is a fee of C$975 for every successful immigrant, with loans available for those unable to pay.
Critics see Canadian policy as harsh, or as a futile exercise in picking winners.
But it does at least offer potential immigrants some rules that are not entirely capricious, it does not rely so heavily as the U.S. system on long waiting lists, and it puts a reasonably high priority on the applicant's ability to be financially self-sufficient.
Page 56 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
New Zealand actively recruits immigrants, but not without some rules.
Applicants must meet ''a minimum standard of English'' (equivalent to an 11 year old native).
Their immigration department notes that ''a job offer that is waiting for you is a good way to determine if you are the type of person New Zealand needs.''
Arriving with ''settlement funds'' of more than 100,000 New Zealand dollars helps too.
The country's point system favors youth, subtracting points after age 30 and noting frankly that ''a person over the age of 55 on the Skills category and 64 for the Business Category will not be accepted.''
Obviously, the U.S. public might favor quite different standards and priorities than either Canada or New Zealand, if the issue was ever put to them in this way.
But so long as immigration depends as heavily as it has on having relatives in the U.S., on being willing to wait a long time, on winning a lottery, or on being granted refugee or asylee status, the U.S. cannot really be said to have any coherent immigration standards at all.
RATIONING METHODS Immigration policy is about rationing something of great value--the right to live in the United States.
The question boils down to methods and criteria of rationing a relatively small number of spaces among a much larger number of people who would like to live in the United States.
There are only four possible rationing methods--the queue, the lottery, allocation by political or bureaucratic preference, or the price system (a fifth option, of course, is to immigrate illegally).
Current policy mainly relies on a mixture of political preference categories and the queue, although the lottery is used too.
Page 57 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Foreigners offered a U.S. job requiring less than two years' experience find themselves in ''Employment Third Preference'' class, and must wait 10 years for a visa.
Permanent residents sponsoring an unmarried child over age 21 are in a family category 2B, which has a 6 year wait.
Brothers and sisters of U.S. citizens are in ''Family Fourth Preference,'' which recently had a waiting list of more than one million.
Marrying a U.S. citizen can push you ahead in the line, which has created a booming market in mail order brides.
Ordinary citizens have no idea how these quotas on importing various categories of people are established, which makes the process vulnerable to the tug and pull of interest groups and log-rolling.
I propose making somewhat more use of the price system, as Canada does, by requiring a modest immigration fee.
This would be far more ''fair'' than relying entirely on arbitrary quotas and multi-year waiting lists.
A user fee on immigration services of, say, one or two thousand dollars per accepted immigrant would serve as a means of reducing waiting lists by weeding out marginal applicants with a weak commitment to the U.S.
As another another example of the price system, a trial program could begin with an auction of diversity quotas, to replace the current use of gambling.
Even with some use of price system, there will still be quotas and queues.
The normal problem of the future will not be job creation but the opposite--finding enough qualified workers, to do the work demanded of a high-tech economy.
Still, it might be socially soothing to adjust annual immigration quotas downward in recessions, and upward when jobs are plentiful, by adopting a formula that would link a portion of the coming year's immigration quota to unemployment rates in the preceding third quarter.
Page 58 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Half of the problem of illegal immigration is not due to sneaking across the border, but to overstaying legal visas.
I propose a system of fines that grows geometrically larger the longer a visa was overdue (e.g., doubled every month).
Anyone would be free to leave without paying the fine, or could be deported, but such a person would never again be readmitted without paying the fine plus penalties for late payment.
Illegal acts must carry some sanctions for those who commit them, and financial sanctions seem more appropriate.
Imprisoning illegal aliens puts their burden on U.S. taxpayers, and wastes limited court time and prison space that could be better devoted to violent criminals.
Those seeking asylum should ask before arriving, like refugees, not just settle here illegally and hire a lawyer.
Out of half a million asylee cases received from 1990-94, only 4.5% were approved.
This post-1980 opportunity for illegal aliens to remain in the U.S. by going through the motions of applying for asylee status (and often remaining long after the case is denied), is an unnecessary invitation to abuse.
Regardless how many immigrants are legally admitted, a key question is how best to ration valuable immigration rights.
What is needed is not another rousing defense of immigration in general, nor an equally indiscriminate closing of the borders, but a serious, comprehensive reexamination of the criteria and methods by which rights to U.S. residence have been regulated.
We must rely on some criteria for determining an immigrant's eligibility.
I suggest that the most sensible (and ultimately the most humane) criteria are those that demonstrate the potential immigrant's ability to support himself and his family formal education, occupational experience, training or other skills (including English language skills), and accumulated savings.
Page 59 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
A constructive and compassionate immigration policy must put the primary emphasis on making sure that new entrants have sufficient human and/or financial capital to become productive members of the economy and society.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Mr. Reynolds.
I think it is important to point out it is not just coincidental that all three of you seem to see eye to eye on many issues.
I say that that is not coincidental, because you all are aware in the last 18 months there have been a half a dozen studies on our current immigration policy that surprisingly have all reached the same conclusion.
And the conclusion, the consensus of these half dozen studies, including your own, is that our current immigration policy, at least in some respects, does not serve the best interest of America.
And as I mentioned, we seem to have a mismatch between the needs of the work force, future needs of the work force of America, and our current immigration policy.
I think that you all agree that in that respect, our current policy is flawed and that we need to do something--and we will talk about that in just a minute--to give a greater priority to immigrants who have an educational level that will enable them to find a job and work, and to work and to contribute and to produce when they come to America, thereby not only strengthening the economy but supplying the needs of our work force as well.
Dr. Borjas, let me address my first question to you.
You mentioned in your opening statement the fact--in fact, this was the last point I think you made--that the large numbers of low-skilled foreign workers are responsible for half the decline in relative wages among those in America who lack a high school education.
You also point out at the end of your opening statement, I believe, that the adverse impact of immigration on the well-being of workers at the bottom end of the skilled distribution has been substantial.
Page 60 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
What, specifically, do you recommend that Congress do in order to correct that situation? Mr. BORJAS.
Before we can address that issue, we have to address another question, which is what do we want to attain from our immigration policy, what is it the country wants to have by having a particular kind of immigrant? If we, for the sake of argument, say we want to improve the living conditions of native workers and we care about native workers both in terms of their per-capita income as well as distribution of income, then it is pretty clear that a more skilled immigrant flow would tend to provide both the higher per-capita income to native workers, as well as ameliorate the problems of having a more unequal income distribution, which arises when you have less-skilled immigrants coming in, in the kind of changing economy we have been having in the last 20 years.
As all of you know, we have a lot of income growth inequality in the last 20 years, and having a less-skilled immigrant flow coming in only makes our problem worse.
So both in terms of solving--not solving, but ameliorating the problem of income inequality and increasing per-capita income for native workers, one would think an immigration policy that not only depended on family preference but also included some other measures of individual immigrants that come in would be preferable.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you.
Dr. Borjas, I appreciate also in your testimony you pointing out the problems of what we call the spatial correlation approach, where you can't just necessarily compare cities, and I think that was an important contribution as well.
Page 61 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. BORJAS.
Thank you.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Dr. Vernez, you mentioned in your testimony that our current immigration policy not only contributes to the unemployment rate among those who haven't finished high school in America but also depresses the wages of those individuals, and that you agree with Dr. Borjas.
You also mentioned the problem is not just of this generation but it is of future generations as well, since oftentimes there is a correlation between the educational level of a parent and the employment and productivity of the child.
I thought it might be interesting, and I know we have a couple Californians here, that you conclude that the annual tax burden on a native-born California household is $1,170 due to our immigration policy today; is that correct? Mr. VERNEZ.
That is a conclusion reached by the National Research Council, and we agree with that.
That was probably the best estimate to be made in recent years, but that is not our estimate.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
That is the National Research Council's? Mr. VERNEZ.
Right.
And the reason for the cost, of course, is not so much that immigrants are using services at a higher rate than natives if they have the same income and family composition, it is mainly because they have lower income and larger family size.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
In your recommendations for policy changes you say, ''We propose that a better balance should be found between the demands of family reunification and the demands for higher-skilled labor in the work force.''
And you say that specifically we recommend that, in the RAND study, ''Specifically we recommend that current policies be modified to place greater emphasis on the educational levels of new immigrants.''
Page 62 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
How specifically would you recommend that we do that? I agree with you, obviously, but how can we implement that? Mr. VERNEZ.
There are various ways that can be implemented.
Of course, one way, without changing very much the architecture of immigration policy as it is now, would be to increase the number of immigrants who would be allowed to come for employment-related reasons, and of course you could tie to this an education criterion.
The other would be to proceed a little bit like Canada is proceeding, which is a point system that would provide different points for education, for English proficiency, in addition to points for family reunifications.
That would require much greater change in the architecture of immigration policy.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Dr. Vernez.
If my colleagues will let me, I am going to sneak in one more question for Mr. Reynolds.
You mentioned in your comments what the Hudson Institute had concluded, which was that unless the education and skill levels of the American work force are upgraded, America's productivity and prosperity will grow less quickly.
America must stop recruiting workers for jobs that do not exist or exist only at the lowest levels.
And then you say that, in your view, the most important immigration issue is whether or not U.S. policy can imprudently continue to be indifferent about inviting large numbers of permanent residents who lack basic education or language skills.
Page 63 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
When you say that the immigration policy today is unrelated to any concept of what is good for the U.S. economy or society, in what ways could we change our policy to better reflect the goals that you stated and the goals that I agree with? Mr. REYNOLDS.
The implication of those remarks is that if you want to increase the emphasis on skills, you have to deemphasize something else or else immigrate more people, and that is just mathematically the problem.
So if we put such high emphasis on a family reunification, meaning bringing in more people from the same countries the last batch came from, and if we put such high emphasis on refugee status, then, by definition, there is less room available for the others.
I suspect that something along the lines of the Canada and New Zealand point system is what I am aiming at.
I think the system has to be totally crossed out and started over again.
That is a little strong, but that is basically what it is.
It just sort of evolved.
I don't think anyone has really tried to design an immigration policy for the United States.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Mr. Reynolds.
We have just been joined by the Ranking Member, Mr. Watt of North Carolina.
We will first go first to questions from Ms. Lofgren, the gentlewoman California.
Page 64 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Ms. LOFGREN.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
This is obviously a very interesting and useful hearing for the committee.
Many of our later witnesses will talk about the H-1B program, the temporary visa program for skilled immigrants.
I think it is worthwhile to take a look at the entire picture to see where we are.
I am mindful that while it is very easy to pick apart some of these issues and to focus on problems, our country is the envy of the world.
Everyone wants to come here.
When you talk about economic problems, our economy is stronger than any other in the world--it is stronger than Europe, it is stronger than Asia.
To some extent, we can't be doing everything wrong because we are having the wonderful benefit of whatever it is we are doing.
I am looking, however, at how we might consider changes.
A background of anxiety exists in some parts of the country over diversity, not just immigration itself.
Looking at your statement, Mr. Reynolds, I note on page 2, you are talking about a phenomenon that does exist in terms of a category feeding upon itself.
I do not disagree with that.
I quote, ''The new favoritism is no longer for immigrants from democratic countries with high levels of prosperity and skill, but for immigrants from the same countries that accounted for the last group of immigrants.
This means de facto immigration quotas are heavily biased in favor of aspiring immigrants from Mexico, the former Soviet Union, the Philippines, Vietnam, the Dominican Republic, El Salvador, China, India, and Cuba.
Recent immigrants from these countries bring in their relatives and their newly-arrived relatives in turn sponsor still more relatives.''
You go on to say that this is a problem that Congress tried to patch with the diversity program.
Page 65 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Are you saying that having people come from Vietnam or from China or India is in itself a problem for America? Mr. REYNOLDS.
No.
What I am saying is if you have a limited number of immigrants and that you have biased the system in favor of immigrants, let's say from El Salvador, you are restricting immigrants from Hong Kong and Turkey.
Ms. LOFGREN.
I guess the concern I had in reading this is it feeds into some of the hate mail I receive.
I am not suggesting, however, that you are doing that.
Mr. REYNOLDS.
Let me make it clear.
I am pro-immigration, I just don't think we have an immigration policy.
I am pro-Mexico, for example.
I spent a lot of time down there, I am published down there, they know me down there.
I am an ex-Californian.
My house is now owned by a Mexican family.
So, no; I mean, obviously there are skilled and unskilled people.
But you are not doing people a favor by bringing them in here when they are not able to cope.
Ms. LOFGREN.
So the point you are trying to make is not where these folks are coming from, but their level of skill, not the country or the color of their skin or their ethnicity or their religion or anything of that nature? Mr. REYNOLDS.
Why should you favor one country over another.
You should favor people over another, perhaps for criteria that have to do with the national interest, but not one country over another people.
Page 66 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Ms. LOFGREN.
Thank you.
That is very helpful.
I would like to go back to Dr. Borjas.
I have looked at your charts.
It is very difficult, I think, to get facts everyone agrees on because we don't do a very good job of collecting statistics in this country and it is very difficult when you have poor data to extrapolate and make findings.
I see the mean educational attainment and the wage differential and the like.
Have you specifically taken a look at the economic impact of, for example, Ph.D. level immigrants or master's degree immigrants and how many jobs are created by each scientist, in industry? Or is that a benefit or burden? Mr. BORJAS.
I have estimated benefits from immigration at the national level, not by education groups so much, but at the national level.
And in fact, the National Academy of Sciences report that has been mentioned before cites several of these studies that tried to estimate the benefit from immigration, including my own study.
And almost every study that exists right now that estimates benefits at the national level tends to find that, yes, there is a net benefit, but the net benefit tends to be surprisingly small.
Ms. LOFGREN.
If I may interrupt, because I know the Chairman is going to, and probably will be stern about our 5-minute limit, I read those reports as well.
But, again, it is very difficult to quantify.
How do you quantify, the positive economic impact of, for example, Andy Grove of Intel.
He was an immigrant.
Intel employs a lot of Americans, including my neighbors in Silicon Valley.
Or James Gosing over at Sun Microsystems, who invented Java.
The economic impact of that invention is huge, but there is no attempt to quantify that in these figures.
Have you tried to quantify these factors? Page 67 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. BORJAS.
There are benefits and costs that are impossible to quantify and the ones that cannot be quantified cannot be quantified.
Ms. LOFGREN.
Thank you very much.
I see my red light is on, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Ms. Lofgren.
The gentleman from Indiana, Mr. Pease, is recognized.
Mr. PEASE.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Dr. Borjas, you spoke early in your presentation about the clustering phenomenon and seemed to conclude, or implied, that the clustering was entirely an economic phenomenon.
Does your study at all indicate that there may be noneconomic reasons for that clustering as well and, if so, how does that affect what you presented earlier? Mr. BORJAS.
Let me clarify what I meant to say.
Clustering happens.
There are economic impacts that follow from the clustering.
What I was talking about today is the economic impacts that follow from the clustering.
When immigrants cluster in a particular place, the locale will be affected the most, and then through flows, that impact is distributed away from that locality.
But why that clustering happens can be due to both economic impacts, good jobs, attracting particular kinds of immigrants, but also the networks.
I mean, social networks are incredibly important in determining where immigrants end up in the United States.
So I certainly do not mean to imply clustering is just an economic matter, but it has economic impacts.
Page 68 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. PEASE.
Okay.
That is helpful.
Dr. Vernez, you went through your presentation and then got to the point and said, ''I now have two recommendations to make,'' and that was the end.
You may have been able to make a couple other points, but I wanted to be sure you were able to share with us your recommendations completely.
Mr. VERNEZ.
I appreciate that.
We had several recommendations, but the two most important is one concerning immigration policy and one that concerns education policy.
I know this is not the domain of this subcommittee, but I think it is important and needs to be done.
With respect to immigration policy, we are certainly suggesting a shift and a better balance between low-educated and better-educated immigrants, as I mentioned earlier.
We also suggest that we should somewhat reduce the level of immigration from the current high, of about 900,000 now to somewhere in-between that number and the 300,000 that we had in the 1970's.
In other words, looking for a moderate level of immigration, as opposed to what is now a fairly high level of immigration.
Part of it, of course, is to reduce-low educated immigration.
The other, of course, is because the economy fluctuates.
When you are in a booming economy, certainly you can have a higher level of immigration, but you always also have a slowdown in the economy, as has happened in California when we had a very deep recession for 5 to 6 years.
During that time, there was no job growth, while immigration continued at a very high level, and it created a major backlash against immigration, which in the long run is not in the interest of formulating good policy.
With these considerations, we feel that immigration policy in this country should be somewhat more flexible.
Page 69 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
With respect to education policy, what I mentioned is basically that there will be two impacts on the education system.
One occurs in those States where there is a high concentration of immigrants.
There the demand for education is increasing very rapidly, and these States have a lot of difficulties in meeting the demand for resources to meet the needs to educate this new population.
The second is a shift in the composition of the student body, particularly, as I mentioned, toward Hispanics.
Because their parents have low levels of education and they have low incomes; their children may graduate from high school, but they are not going to go to college in high proportion enough.
With that level of education, they are not going to be able to compete in an economy that requires a college education in order to get an adequately-paid job.
Mr. PEASE.
Dr. Vernez, thank you.
I understand your concern on the educational attainment level of immigrants, and I understand the point that you just made about advocating a smaller number of immigrants.
If changes were made in the immigration policy to require higher levels of educational attainment, would you still advocate lower levels of immigration? Mr. VERNEZ.
Probably, yes.
Mr. PEASE.
And the reason for that is? Mr. VERNEZ.
For the same reason, is that now we are in a booming economy in high-tech and so on, but it is not necessarily going to last.
Page 70 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
At the same level, also, if you have an impact--as long as the economy creates those jobs, the effect on the wages will not be that great.
But if you have a large number of high-educated aliens who come in and the demand for the job after a period of time diminishes, it will automatically also have an impact on wages and so on.
So the same economic consideration that happens at the low level of education will eventually happen at the high level of education.
Mr. PEASE.
Would you advocate a system that was flexible enough to restrict entry in times of high unemployment or would you just rather say we are not going to introduce any increasing numbers of folks into this system at all? Mr. VERNEZ.
Obviously, here we are moving less on an empirical basis and on a matter of opinions.
My opinion is that if around 1990-92 we had slightly decreased the number of immigrants, the quotas for immigration, I don't believe there would be as high an immigration backlash in California than in fact we had to go through, in part because people would have seen that some action had been taken and that their concerns were being taken into consideration.
Mr. PEASE.
Thank you.
Mr. Reynolds, there are some things I would like to talk with you about, but my time is out.
Maybe I can catch you back at the airport in Indianapolis.
Page 71 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Mr. Pease, why don't you go ahead and ask one more question of Mr. Reynolds? Mr. PEASE.
One, if you could expand for me--you set forth a variety of options on if we were starting from the beginning and writing an immigration policy, the models that seem to provide, or are in use in various forms, and you talked about the queue, the lottery, political or bureaucratic preference, but I didn't catch your last one, and I think that was one where you were starting to explain that Canada is involved with it.
But I may have misunderstood that.
Mr. REYNOLDS.
The last one is the price system.
And that could mean an auction.
For example, I think diversity quotas would be better handled by an auction than by the lottery, which is sort of a confession of no priorities.
The lottery is as random as its gets.
But I particularly meant just a small fee, $1,000 or $2,000 per entrant.
You could provide a loan, as Canada does.
For one thing, it would help solve the social question of are immigrants on balance a net cost or a net benefit.
They would be paying the cost of the Immigration and Naturalization Service.
Mr. PEASE.
Are you familiar with Canada's experience? Is this a recent development for Canada? Mr. REYNOLDS.
Yes.
Canada's use of the fee is only a couple years old, and I don't have any feedback on how effective it has been.
But it seems to me it would shorten the list.
You have a 6- to 10-year waiting list.
They might be 5 to 9, is all I am saying, and there are other reasons to do it.
Page 72 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. PEASE.
Thank you very much.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Mr. Pease.
The gentleman from North Carolina, Mr. Watt, is recognized.
Mr. WATT.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I just want to take a moment to apologize to this panel of witnesses for not being here and to my colleagues for not being here at the start of the hearing.
I have been trying to get out of North Carolina, and they have been trying to get me out of North Carolina, for those of you who have been following my district configuration woes.
So maybe they got, for a little while, what they were striving to achieve.
I don't think I will burden you all with any questions, because I also have not had an opportunity to review your testimony.
But I will commit to you that I will.
This is an issue the Chairman has been trying to get me, for quite some time, to focus on.
He keeps sending me written materials, and I think he finally gave up on the notion that I might read some of that and decided to hit me between the eyes with a hearing, or at least a panel of a hearing, on this issue which I was able to sidestep, too.
But I will read the testimony.
I have heard some provocative comments, just in the short time I have been here, at least from Mr. Reynolds.
I heard his comment about there not being an immigration policy.
And that is not that much different from some of the comments I have made over at the Brookings Institute when I gave a speech over there.
And that has certainly been my observation for the last year or year and a half that I have been the ranking member of this committee and becoming more and more familiar with the law in the area, that it just seems to be more of a hodgepodge than any consistent philosophical or reasoned basis for a number of the policies that we have; and so I will study your testimony very carefully.
Page 73 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
With that, Mr. Chairman, I think I will yield the balance of my time to Ms. Lofgren, since she has been here and has some more questions.
Ms. LOFGREN.
Thank you, Mr. Watt.
Taking a look again, Mr. Vernez, at your testimony and listening to your comments about the job market, you appear to believe that we have a zero sum game, that we will never have more than the hundred jobs, and that it is just a matter of deciding where of those hundred jobs are going.
In Silicon Valley, we see a much different situation.
Silicon Valley is fueled by tremendous growth and an astounding booming economy that is very much related to the diversity we find within that community.
For example, last month we had added 10,000 jobs in the county.
We added 58,000 in the last 12 months, and most of them are very well-paid jobs.
In getting back to your testimony about the lack of job growth for high school graduates, I am trying to figure out where that testimony comes from and to compare it to the dynamic I am seeing at home.
For example, the building trades, which is skilled work but does not require, in most cases, more than a high school diploma, have pulled everyone they can out of the union shops in Southern California.
When I went to Houston last year, I talked to the head of the building trades.
They have ripped everyone out of Houston.
I know personally you can't get anyone to come build anything because there is a delay in funding these workers.
Page 74 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Three days ago, I visited a cable company.
They require a high school diploma in order to be a cable installer.
The cable company does the training.
The starting wage is $12 an hour and, within 2 years, most, more than half their employees earn $25 an hour.
They are losing people to the computer industry.
They can't find enough people.
So that is what I am seeing at home, and yet it doesn't square with your testimony.
Can you help me out with this? Mr. VERNEZ.
Let me assure you that I don't consider this as a zero sum game, not at all.
The economy, quite to the contrary, is very dynamic and what is happening is that, to a very large extent, immigrants have been taking low-skilled jobs that native born have been vacating either through retirement or because, as you probably know, the level of education of the native labor force has increased very rapidly over the past 20 years.
In our estimate, which is perhaps a low-boundary estimate, we have estimated that for every 20 to 30 immigrants there is one native born who is displaced.
So this is not a very high level of displacement.
Now, I am saying it is probably a lower-boundary estimate because of the comments Dr. Borjas made a little bit before.
But, as you know, as more people come into California from abroad, more native-borns may be moving out of California, or those who might have come in are not coming in.
And, indeed, we have seen over the last 30 years a changing pattern in internal migration in and out of California, with low-educated native born leaving California, but California continues to attract very high levels of native born from other States.
Page 75 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
So, by all means, this is dynamic.
I think I don't want to overestimate the--or give you the impression of overestimating the negative effects.
There are definitely positive effects.
You raised with me the question of whether anyone had tried to estimate the effect on the growth.
We did try to estimate the effect on the growth of the California economy relative to the rest of the Nation.
As you probably know, the California economy has grown, over the 30 years that we looked at, at about 15 percentage points more rapidly than the rest of the Nation.
And we estimated that about 10 to 15 percent of that higher growth was due to immigration.
So definitely there are benefits.
Ms. LOFGREN.
My time is up, but I do want to say that I wish our former colleague, Xavier Becerra, were here in person to refute the idea that the children of uneducated Latino immigrants will not go on to go to Stanford and law school and be elected to Congress.
Mr. VERNEZ.
That is a reality, though.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Ms. Lofgren.
Thank you all very much.
We appreciate your being here.
Mr. ROGAN.
Mr. Chairman.
Page 76 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Oh, I am sorry.
The gentleman from California, Mr. Rogan, is recognized.
Jim, I apologize.
Mr. ROGAN.
This is the thanks I get for being the first person to show up at the hearing.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
I am in undue haste.
Mr. ROGAN.
Mr. Chairman, the oversight is forgiven; and the apology is not necessary.
And to show my good sportsmanship, my questioning will be actually very brief for this panel.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
I was about to give you an extra minute for that.
Mr. ROGAN.
I promise I won't need it.
I realize we have been essentially dealing with the micro-level on immigration.
I want to shift for a moment to the macro-level, where I think some of the other witnesses will be going.
I am sure all you gentlemen know our colleague in the other body has introduced a bill in the Senate that would essentially double the H-1B visa program, and this is in response to a number of high-tech companies, particularly out in California, that are complaining that there is a shortage of skilled labor in these areas.
Have any of the witnesses on this panel had the opportunity to review that particular situation or the bill itself and, if so, would you please comment? Page 77 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Yes, Mr. Reynolds.
Mr. REYNOLDS.
I have not, but no knowledge doesn't prevent me from having an opinion.
Mr. ROGAN.
That sort of qualifies you as a Member of Congress.
Mr. WATT.
That is what I was going to say.
You sound like a Member of Congress.
Mr. REYNOLDS.
I couldn't stand the cut in pay.
Anyway, my feeling about it is, if it is impossible to reallocate the number of, let's say, admissible immigrants by cutting back on family--by reordering priorities, then it would make sense to expand the skill-based quotas, if you will, and make them permanent by a factor of two.
I would say by a factor of five.
Let's say 700,000.
When I said I was pro immigration, I wasn't kidding.
My own personal view, by the way.
Mr. ROGAN.
Thank you.
Dr. Vernez.
Mr. VERNEZ.
I don't have a particular opinion.
I have not studied this.
The only perhaps observations I can make is that I would probably favor doing it through permanent immigration rather than through temporary immigration, because the experience has been that temporary immigration turns into permanent immigration anyhow.
Page 78 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. ROGAN.
Dr. Borjas, any comment? Mr. BORJAS.
I think the shift toward a more skilled employee is a good thing to have.
But I would also worry a little bit about the impact of large numbers of skilled immigrants on very small occupations in the United States.
For example, a flow of mathematicians from foreign countries can have a huge impact on the mathematician occupations in the United States.
There are benefits that occupations that are affected are relatively small, and the impact could be much greater.
So one has to keep in mind that there is a job effect that could be very diverse.
Mr. ROGAN.
Dr. Borjas, have you had a chance to review the pending litigation in the other body? Mr. BORJAS.
Only through what The New York Times says.
Mr. ROGAN.
I will resist the temptation to comment further.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I yield back the balance of my time.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Mr. Rogan.
And, once again, let me thank the members of the panel for their contributions today.
Page 79 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The subcommittee welcomes our second panel, and the second panel consists of John Fraser, Acting Administrator, Wage and Hour Division, Employment Standards Administration, U.S. Department of Labor; and Carlotta Joyner, Director, Education and Employment Issues, Health, Education, and Human Services Division, U.S.
General Accounting Office.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Mr. Fraser, don't take this personally, but I hope you will pass along a message, and it has to do with the time that we were given your testimony.
As I say, I know you are not responsible for that, but we have, quite frankly, put the Department of Justice on notice, and I guess today we are putting the Department of Labor on notice.
As I understand it, your testimony was received last night at 9 p.m.
That is not very thoughtful, either of the staff who has to stay late to read it or the members of the subcommittee who would like to be prepared for this hearing that we are in right now.
I don't need to say anything more, but I hope you will relay that to the individuals who do make the decision about when we receive the testimony.
And having given you that nice introduction, please proceed.
STATEMENT OF JOHN FRASER, ACTING ADMINISTRATOR, WAGE AND HOUR DIVISION, EMPLOYMENT STANDARDS ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR Mr. FRASER.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I was also there at 9 o'clock last night, so I will convey our mutual concerns back to those who need to hear it.
Page 80 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I will try very hard to stay within 5 minutes this morning.
We are going to make the shift, I think, in this panel from the big-picture discussion of immigration in general to a narrower discussion of views on whether this country's important high-technology industry should be afforded increased access to foreign temporary workers to meet its growing demand for highly skilled workers.
Our IT industry is essential to our continuing strong economic growth and wider prosperity in this country.
The administration believes that the issue of whether to increase the industry's access to temporary foreign workers should be evaluated within the framework of three questions: First, is there a shortage of skilled U.S. workers to fill jobs in the IT industry and meet future workforce needs; secondly, what would be the consequence of increasing the H-1B cap; and, thirdly, does the current H-1B program need to be reformed in order to provide industry appropriate access to foreign temporary workers while protecting the job opportunities, wages and working conditions of U.S. workers? I will touch on each of these very quickly and leave much of the discussion on the first item to the other panelists that will present today.
With respect to the IT labor market and skill shortage issue, there is no dispute that there is a strong demand and growing demand for workers in the IT industry, although it is much less clear what may be the magnitude of any shortage of skilled U.S. workers or whether our domestic labor market will be able, as it has over the last decade, to satisfy projected job growth.
Page 81 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
According to the Bureau of Labor Statistics, employment opportunities for computer systems analysts, engineers and scientists have been growing by 10 percent a year, well above the growth of comparable occupations, and will continue to do so through the next decade.
BLS predicts that the U.S. will require more than 1.3 million new workers in IT core occupations through 2006 to fill job openings that are projected to occur due to growth and the need to replace workers who leave the labor force or transfer to other occupations.
The IT skill shortage issue is, of course, more controversial.
You will hear much today from other panelists on all sides of that issue.
I am only going to suggest this subcommittee consider a couple of factors.
First, while higher than average wage growth can be a reliable indicator of skill shortages, the wage growth record for the IT industry is mixed.
BLS wage trends for broad computer categories show only average wage growth between 1988 and 1997 for all categories and only above-average wage growth in the last 2 years in the lower skilled computer programmer occupations.
The subcommittee should also take into consideration other factors that bear on the question of the scope and duration of any IT labor shortage: The current year 2000 problem, which is now occupying thousands of IT workers, but only in the short-term; the introduction of new technologies that enhance IT productivity; and the fact that the number of computer science enrollments has risen significantly in the last 2 years and that nearly three-quarters of IT workers are trained in other disciplines.
Page 82 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
With respect to the consequence of raising the H-1B visa cap, there are two points I would like to make.
First, we strongly urge that any decision to raise the cap carefully consider the possible adverse impact of such a move on the normal process by which labor markets adjust to growing demands for workers.
As Ms. Lofgren has pointed out, it is important to remember that tight labor markets are good for U.S. workers.
Tight labor markets cause employers to raise wages, improve working conditions, provide increased training to enable currently employed workers to keep pace with technology.
An increased demand for trained workers induces educational and job training institutions to teach new skills.
With more opportunities for training, workers acquire skills needed to obtain better, higher paying and more secure jobs and create job openings and career ladders for those just entering or reentering the labor market.
Tight labor markets create incentives for employers and workers to react in ways needed to achieve many of the Nation's top priorities: raising wages, providing greater opportunities for lifelong learning, and moving welfare recipients, out-of-school youth, and dislocated workers into good, secure jobs.
At the same time, the labor market can be slow to respond when labor markets get tight.
In these circumstances, many argue that temporary foreign workers are needed in the short-term to provide skills while the labor market adjusts.
And, further, because the IT sector is so critical to our global competitive edge, the U.S. economy could suffer disproportionate harm if skills shortages do become acute.
Page 83 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
We must also be cognizant that raising the H-1B cap may subvert the protection of U.S. workers, which is one of the key principles underlying the administration's strong support of legal immigration.
Raising the H-1B cap will almost certainly increase employment-based legal immigration and, perhaps, illegal immigration.
Nearly half of those who become permanent employment-based immigrants convert from H-visa nonimmigrant status.
The administration believes that our first response to meeting the workforce needs of the IT industry should be to provide the needed skills to U.S. workers to qualify them for IT jobs.
The administration has already taken a number of steps in the training and education arena, and those are laid out in my testimony.
And I will just get to the final point, which has to do with the need for reforms in the H-1B program.
Temporary visa programs like H-1B are intended to allow employers who are faced with domestic skill shortages to have access to temporary foreign workers with the requisite skills while the domestic labor market makes appropriate adjustments.
However, as the subcommittee knows, having heard from us about this over the years, there exist serious structural flaws in the current H-1B program.
The Department's Inspector General found that, despite the legislative intent, the H-1B program often serves as a probationary try-out employment program for illegal aliens, foreign students and foreign visitors to determine if they will be sponsored for permanent status.
The IG also found that some H-1B employers use alien labor to reduce payroll costs, either by paying less than the prevailing wage to their own alien employees or treating these employees as independent contractors, avoiding related payroll and administrative costs.
And, as the subcommittee knows, other H-1B employers are job contractors, whose business is to provide alien contract labor to other employees.
Page 84 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
It is important to note that the IG concluded that the H-1B program does little to protect the jobs or wages of U.S. workers, and it recommended eliminating the current program and establishing a new one which would better fulfill Congress' intent.
The current H-1B program does not require employers who use it to test the U.S. labor market to try to recruit U.S. workers for the jobs that they are trying to fill.
It does not require U.S. employers who want access to foreign temporary workers to promise not to lay off or displace U.S. workers to fill those jobs with temporary foreign workers.
That is why, since 1993, the administration has urged the Congress to include those reforms in this program, and I renew that call to the subcommittee this morning.
Our amendments, first proposed in 1993, were carefully designed to ensure continued business access to needed high-skilled workers in the international labor market while decreasing the H-1B program's susceptibility to misuse to the detriment of U.S. workers and the businesses that employ them.
Mr. Chairman, I will conclude by saying that the administration's view is that our first public policy response to skill shortages should be to train and develop U.S. workers to fill those jobs, U.S. workers, including new immigrants to this country.
Solving skill shortage problems, especially perceived skill shortage problems, with increased immigration should be our last, not our first, public policy response to that kind of situation.
With that, Mr. Chairman, I will conclude and let Ms. Joyner make her presentation.
Page 85 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Mr. Fraser.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Fraser follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN R. FRASER, ACTING ADMINISTRATOR, WAGE AND HOUR DIVISION, EMPLOYMENT STANDARDS ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: We appreciate this opportunity to share the views of the Administration on whether this country's important high-technology industry should be afforded increased access to temporary foreign workers to meet its growing demand for highly skilled workers.
In doing so, I want to again call your attention to the need to train U.S. workers first in order to provide them with the opportunity to acquire the skills needed to compete in our rapidly changing economy, and to the pressing need for reform of the H-1B nonimmigrant visa program.
Our information technology (IT) industry is essential to our continuing strong economic growth and wider prosperity.
Our interest in the industry's strength is evidenced by our participation in a recent convocation in Berkeley that assessed IT work force needs.
Further, as you know from Administration proposals advanced since 1993, we believe that the H-1B program needs fundamental reform.
I would like to commend the Subcommittee for its interest in these issues.
We believe the issue of whether to increase the IT industry's access to temporary foreign workers should be evaluated within the framework of the following three questions: Page 86 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
(1) Is there a shortage of skilled U.S. workers to fill jobs in the IT industry and meet future workforce needs? (2) What would be the consequences of raising the annual H-1B cap? (3) Does the current H-1B program need to be reformed in order to provide industry appropriate access to temporary foreign workers while protecting the job opportunities, wages and working conditions of U.S. workers? I will address each of these in turn.
TIGHT LABOR MARKETS AND IT SKILLS SHORTAGES Proponents of increasing the annual cap on H-1B visas argue that this increase is necessary for the IT industry to be able to overcome an acute shortage of skilled U.S. workers.
While there is no dispute that there is strong growth in demand for workers in the IT industry, it is much less clear what may be the magnitude of any shortage of skilled U.S. workers to meet this demand, or whether the domestic labor market will be able--as it has over the last decade--to satisfy projected job growth.
U.S. employment has been growing rapidly, labor markets are increasingly tight, and they are likely to remain so.
Though this is true for the nation as a whole, IT labor markets appear to be particularly affected.
Employment opportunities for computer systems analysts, engineers, and scientists have been growing by 10 percent a year--well above the growth of comparable occupations--and are expected to continue growing at a comparable rate through 2006.
The Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS) predicts that the U.S. will require more than 1.3 million new workers in IT core occupations between 1996 and 2006 to fill job openings projected to occur due to growth and the need to replace workers who leave the labor force or transfer to other occupations.
Page 87 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The IT skills shortage issue is somewhat controversial.
Some industry advocates assert that there exist more than three hundred thousand unfilled jobs within the IT industry, and that these vacancies are raising business costs and hurting U.S. competitiveness.
Industry points to a number of other factors to substantiate their assertion of an IT skills shortage--large numbers of want ads, hiring bonuses, aggressive recruiting, and high turnover of IT specialists within the industry.
On the other hand, critics argue that the IT industry: (1) overstates the problem by producing inflated job vacancy data and equating it to skills shortages; (2) continues to lay off tens of thousands of workers (e.g., Intel, Netscape, Cypress Semiconductor and Silicon Graphics recently announced large lay-offs); and (3) fails to tap reservoirs of available talent by insisting on unnecessarily specific job requirements and not providing more training to develop incumbent workers' skills.
One point of contention is the confusion between equating job vacancies and actual skills shortages.
While an industry association-sponsored survey indicates that there may be as many as 350,000 job vacancies in the IT industry, as you will hear, the General Accounting Office (GAO) has concluded that this does not necessarily signal an acute shortage of skilled workers.
In fact, most industries and firms (particularly those with rapid employment growth and high worker turnover) will have large numbers of job openings that may not indicate skills shortages.
While higher than average wage growth can be a reliable indicator of skill shortages, the wage growth record for the IT industry is mixed.
Though BLS wage trends for broad computer-related categories show only average wage growth between 1988 and 1997 for all categories, it only shows above-average wage growth in 1996 and 1997 and only in the lower-skill computer-related categories, such as programmers.
At the same time, a variety of industry wage surveys show larger wage increases in 1996 and 1997 in specialized, high-skill occupations.
Page 88 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The Subcommittee should also take into consideration other factors that bear on the question of the scope and duration of any labor shortage in the IT industry: The current ''Year 2000'' problem is now occupying thousands of IT workers but only for the short-term; New technologies are being introduced that are creating more efficient ways to produce software, store and retrieve data, speed up computations, and generally improve the productivity of the IT work force; The number of computer science enrollments has risen significantly in the last two years (and nearly three-quarters of all IT workers got their education in other disciplines).
CONSEQUENCES OF RAISING THE H-1B VISA CAP We strongly urge that any decision to raise the H-1B visa cap carefully consider the possible adverse impact of such a move on the normal process by which labor markets adjust to a growing demand for workers.
The labor market should be permitted to adjust to this increased demand without introducing unnecessary factors which could delay, if not prevent, these normal market adjustments.
Indeed, the IT labor market has already begun to respond to the signals of increased demand.
A survey of U.S. Ph.D. departments of computer science and computer engineering showed bachelor-level enrollments were up 46 percent in 1996, and another 39 percent in 1997--nearly doubling over the two year period.
Page 89 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
It is also important to remember that tight labor markets are good for U.S. workers.
A tight labor market causes employers to raise wages, improve working conditions, and provide increased training to enable currently employed workers to keep pace with technology.
An increased demand for trained workers induces educational and job training institutions to teach new skills.
With more opportunities for training, workers acquire skills needed to obtain better, higher-paying and more secure jobs, thereby creating open jobs and career ladders for those just entering or reentering the labor market (e.g., young people, minorities, displaced workers, welfare recipients and other disadvantaged groups).
Therefore, tight labor markets create incentives for employers and workers to react in ways needed to achieve many of the Nation's top priorities: raising wages; providing greater opportunities for lifelong learning; and moving welfare recipients, out-of-school youth, and dislocated workers into jobs.
However, while tight labor markets are good for U.S. workers, labor markets can sometimes be slow to respond to skills shortages.
In these circumstances, it is often argued that temporary foreign workers are needed in the short-term to provide necessary skills while the labor market adjusts to provide U.S. workers with the requisite training.
Without needed foreign temporary workers, industries experiencing skill shortages may adjust in ways that do not serve the short-term or long-term priorities of the country, either by reducing job creation or by moving jobs overseas.
Further, because the IT sector is so critical to our global competitive edge, the U.S. economy could suffer disproportionate harm if skill shortages do become acute.
Because the expanded use of foreign temporary workers may interfere with labor market adjustments and may make achieving our other priorities more difficult, we must make sure that any increase in the annual number of foreign temporary workers is done with care to ensure that the use of these foreign temporary workers does not interfere with healthy adjustments in the labor market.
Page 90 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
We must also be cognizant that raising the H-1B cap may subvert the protection of U.S. workers that is one of the key principles underlying this Administration's strong support of legal immigration.
Raising the H-1B cap will almost certainly increase permanent employment-based legal immigration and, perhaps, illegal immigration.
Nearly half of those who become permanent employment-based immigrants convert from H-visa nonimmigrant status.
Rather than filling a temporary labor shortage, conversion fills permanent jobs that will then not be available to U.S. workers and students who we want to be able and prepared to fill high-tech jobs in our economy.
The Department of Labor has heard from many concerned individuals and groups on the issue of the adverse impact on U.S. workers of raising the annual cap on H-1B visas.
I would like to request that copies of the many letters we have received from these people be included in the record of today's hearing.
The Administration believes that our first response to meeting the workforce needs of the IT industry should be to provide the needed skills to U.S. workers to qualify them for IT jobs.
The Administration already has taken significant steps to increase our capacity to enhance workforce skills.
The President continues to pursue comprehensive reform of the Nation's employment and training system by working with Congress to enact the principles embodied in his GI Bill proposal.
Moreover, in the historic balanced budget agreement of last summer, the President insisted on and achieved the largest increase in 30 years in the Federal investment to expand the skills of American workers, including: the largest Pell Grant increase in two decades; Page 91 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Hope Scholarships to make the first two years of post-secondary education universally available; the Lifelong Learning Tax Credit for the last 2 years of college and continuing adult education and training to upgrade worker skills; a major increase in employment and training resources, including increases for dislocated workers and disadvantaged adults and youth; and a $3 billion program to help long-term welfare recipients secure lasting, unsubsidized employment.
Further, the Administration announced several new initiatives at the recent Berkeley Convocation to help address the growing demand for IT workers: A Labor Department Technology Demonstration project to test innovative ways of establishing partnerships between local workforce development systems, employers, training providers and others to train dislocated workers in needed high tech skills; The expansion and integration of America's Job Bank and America's Talent Bank to allow employers and workers to list and access job openings and worker resumes in one integrated system; and The convening of four town hall meetings by the Commerce Department to discuss IT workforce needs, identify innovative practices, and showcase successful models.
Page 92 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In addition, last week President Clinton and Secretary Herman announced that grants totaling $1.6 million are being provided to projects in four states to continue highly successful programs to train dislocated workers for high paying jobs in information technology.
Finally, with the Technology Literacy Challenge and related educational programs, the Administration has put strong emphasis on effective use of educational technology to strengthen our nation's schools and school-to-work transition.
Linking elementary/secondary schools, institutions of higher education, and business can produce the knowledge, know-how, and skills our nation's businesses and young people need in IT.
This creates opportunities for business and America's students alike.
We believe that there is more that can be done to move U.S. workers into high technology jobs, and we welcome the discussions that may be sparked by this hearing.
We are committed to continuing a dialogue with the major stakeholders on this critical workforce issue--government, industry, workers, and education and training institutions--to better define the workforce needs of the IT industry and develop appropriate solutions to meet these needs domestically through commitments from each of the stakeholders.
In sum, Mr. Chairman, our assessment of the likely effects of raising the H-1B cap reconfirms our strong conviction that our primary public policy response to skills mismatches due to changing technologies and economic restructuring must be to prepare the U.S. workforce to meet new demands.
Yet we recognize that short-term demands for skills may require that we develop a balanced, short-term response to meet urgent needs while we actively adjust to rapidly changing circumstances.
However, increased numbers of temporary foreign workers should be the last--not the first--public policy response to skills shortages.
Page 93 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Given this broader context, let me now turn to the third of the issues I listed--the pressing need for reform of the H-1B nonimmigrant program.
H-1B NONIMMIGRANT PROGRAM MUST BE REFORMED The H-1B visa program allows the admission of up to 65,000 workers each year (to stay for as long as six years), to meet short-term, high-skills employment needs in the domestic labor market.
Temporary visa programs, like H-1B, are intended to allow employers who are faced with a domestic skills shortage to have access to temporary foreign workers with the requisite skills while the domestic labor market makes appropriate adjustments.
However, there exist serious structural flaws in the current H-1B program.
These flaws are documented in a May 1996 report by the Department's Inspector General (IG).
I would ask the Subcommittee to accept the IG's full report in the record of today's hearing.
The IG found that, despite the legislative intent: '' . . . the [H-1B] program does not always meet urgent, short-term demand for highly-skilled, unique individuals who are not available in the domestic work force.
Instead, it serves as a probationary try-out employment program for illegal aliens, foreign students, and foreign visitors to determine if they will be sponsored for permanent status.''
Page 94 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The IG also found that ''some [H-1B] employers use alien labor to reduce payroll costs either by paying less than the prevailing wage to their own alien employees or treating these aliens as independent contractors, thereby avoiding related payroll and administrative costs.''
It found, in addition, that ''other [H-1B] employers are 'job shops' whose business is to provide H-1B alien contract labor to other employers.''
The IG concluded that the H-1B program does little to protect the jobs or wages of U.S. workers and it recommended eliminating the current program and establishing a new program to fulfill Congress' intent.
Employers obtain H-1B workers by simply filing a labor condition application (LCA) with the Department affirming that they have complied with four requirements: that the higher of the local prevailing rate or the wage paid to the employer's similarly-employed workers will be paid to the foreign workers; that no strike or lockout exists involving the occupation; that notification has been provided to U.S. workers or their union; and that the employment of H-1B nonimmigrants will not adversely affect the working conditions of U.S. workers similarly employed.
By law, the Labor Department can do no more than review these attestations for completeness and obvious inaccuracies--to determine whether an employer checked all of the boxes, made no flagrant errors, and signed the attestation--and must do so within 7 days of receipt.
Page 95 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Because current law does not require any test for the availability of qualified U.S. workers in the domestic labor market, many of the visas under the current cap of 65,000 can be used by employers to hire foreign workers for purposes other than meeting a skills shortage.
In addition, current law does not require a U.S. employer to promise not to lay off U.S. workers and replace them with H-1B workers as a condition for gaining access to these foreign temporary workers, and it allows employers to retain H-1B workers for up to 6 years to fill a ''temporary'' need.
We simply do not believe this is right.
In 1993 the Administration asked the Congress to amend the H-1B nonimmigrant program to address these structural problems.
Unfortunately for many U.S. businesses and workers, these amendments have not been enacted.
The amendments requested in 1993 were carefully designed to ensure continued business access to needed high-skill workers in the international labor market while decreasing the H-1B program's susceptibility to misuse to the detriment of U.S. workers and the businesses that employ them.
Briefly stated, the amendments would require employers which seek access to temporary foreign ''professional'' workers to also attest that: they have taken timely and significant steps to recruit and retain U.S. workers in these occupations; and they have not laid off or otherwise displaced U.S. workers in the occupations for which they seek nonimmigrant workers in the periods immediately preceding and following their seeking such workers.
Page 96 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Enactment of these reforms will help employers actually facing skills shortages, including those in the IT industry, obtain needed workers through the H-1B program.
Under existing law, employers facing skills shortages must compete for available visas (up to the cap of 65,000) on a first-come, first-served basis with other employers that do not face such shortages.
Thus, enactment of the proposed amendments would reduce pressure on the visa cap by screening out employers that are not faced with skills shortages and have no interest in recruiting U.S. workers.
If the Administration's reforms are not implemented, as the Inspector General has pointed out, the Labor Department will not be able to ensure that the intended purposes of the program are actually served.
The H-1B program exists to ensure that U.S. employers can meet short-term labor needs by limited access to the international labor market.
Under current law, the government cannot ensure that employers use the H-1B program for its intended purpose, and that purpose only.
CONCLUSION Mr. Chairman, let me conclude by restating that the growing workforce needs of the IT industry can only be met--and the strength and growth of the industry secured in the long run--if we take the steps needed to fully develop and utilize the skills of U.S. workers.
Increased reliance on temporary foreign workers should, at most, only be a small part of the solution and must be viewed as a minor complement to the development of the U.S. workforce.
Further, let me repeat that reform of the H-1B program is essential to eliminating abuses under the program and providing appropriate protections for U.S. workers.
Enactment of these reforms would effectively allocate a greater share of H-1B visas to employers facing actual skills shortages.
Page 97 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
I appreciate the interest shown by the Subcommittee and staff in our views, and your thoughtful consideration of them.
The Department looks forward to continuing to work closely and cooperatively with you and your staff on these issues.
Mr. Chairman, that concludes my prepared statement.
I would be happy to respond to any questions.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Ms. Joyner.
STATEMENT OF CARLOTTA C. JOYNER, DIRECTOR, EDUCATION AND EMPLOYMENT ISSUES, HEALTH, EDUCATION, AND HUMAN SERVICES DIVISION, U.S. GENERAL ACCOUNTING OFFICE Ms. JOYNER.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, members of the subcommittee.
I would like to begin by introducing Sigurd Nilsen, to my right, who is a labor economist and assistant director, who is with our group and will be joining me later to answer any questions that you might have.
We are pleased to be here today to discuss our assessment of the Department of Commerce's report on the demand and supply of information technology workers.
As you know, many industry reports and other newspaper or magazine articles have predicted that there will be severe shortages of information technology, or IT, workers and that this would have a very damaging effect on the industry and on the economy as a whole.
Page 98 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In conjunction with cosponsoring a convocation on the supply of IT workers, the U.S. Department of Commerce prepared a report intended to bring attention to the issue.
That report, issued in September 1997, was titled, America's New Deficit, The Shortage of Information Technology Workers.
Today, I would like to discuss our recent review of that analysis of the demand and supply and its conclusion that a shortage of IT workers exists in the United States.
In conducting our work, we reviewed the report and we talked with officials at the Departments of Commerce and Labor and also looked at other available data from sources such as the Bureau of Labor Statistics.
We did not perform any independent analysis to determine whether a shortage of IT workers exists.
As requested, we limited our work to analyzing the methodology used by the Commerce Department in reaching its conclusion.
In summary, we found Commerce's report has serious analytical and methodological weaknesses that undermine the credibility of its conclusion that a shortage of IT workers exists.
The report does not adequately describe the likely supply of IT workers, and the other evidence it presents is also insufficient to reach its conclusion.
However, it is important to note that the lack of support presented in this one report does not lead to a conclusion that there is no shortage.
Instead, as the Commerce report states, we believe additional information and data are needed to more accurately characterize the IT labor market now and in the future.
Page 99 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Regarding the demand for IT workers, the report appears to appropriately establish that the demand is expected to grow.
Although there is no single, universally accepted definition of IT workers, Commerce used the definition used by BLS and focused on occupations of systems analyst, computer scientists and engineers and computer programmers.
In doing so, the report that we reviewed projected over an 11-year period 1 million additional IT workers.
A subsequent update has projected even stronger growth over a 10-year period of 1996 to 2006 that there would be 1.3 million projected openings.
The overall growth rate is expected to be 60 percent in these occupations, compared with 14 percent for all occupations, with the greatest growth being for systems analyst of 92 percent and a lower growth of only 12 percent for computer programmers.
Commerce did not, however, adequately describe the supply of IT workers.
When it quantified the supply to compare with the demand, it only considered those with bachelor's degrees in computer and information sciences.
Thus, they compared the 24,553 recent graduates with the estimate of 95,000 additional IT workers needed each year.
The report also noted that there were many other people who could serve as labor supply, such as people with associate degrees, and also mentioned there were over 15,000 people with those degrees but did not include them in their quantitative analysis.
They also did not, in their analysis, consider workers with degrees in other areas.
And, as has been previously noted, the National Science Foundation found that only 25 percent of those currently working in computer and information science jobs actually had degrees in those particular fields.
Many people who work in these fields have degrees in other areas and have taken additional training to expand their skills and their qualifications for this work.
Page 100 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In drawing its conclusion that an inadequate supply is emerging or that there is a shortage, Commerce cited, in addition to the analysis I just described--and the criticism that I have already levied against that certainly applies--three other areas.
They cited the rising salaries of IT workers, the estimates of unfilled vacancies for IT workers nationwide based on a trade association survey, and offshore sourcing and recruiting.
But the body of evidence from all four of these sources we believe did not adequately support their conclusion, first, that although some data show rising salaries for other IT workers, other data indicate these increases are commensurate with those for other specialty occupations over time, rather than being unique to this particular set of occupations.
Regarding the unfilled vacancies, the 14 percent response rate for the trade association survey makes it inadequate as a basis for a nationwide estimate of unfilled IT jobs.
In addition, the estimate of the number of unfilled vacancies was simply that.
It did not say anything about how long these positions had been vacant; and there is always turnover, as you know, in industries.
It was also too little information provided about offshore sourcing and recruiting to be able to know how to consider that in drawing their conclusion.
Their conclusion actually was variously presented.
As I said, the title described a shortage.
The quantitative analysis in the first part of the report described a shortage and concluded there was one.
Later in the report, however, there was acknowledgment that there was too little information.
Statistical frameworks and methodologies for measuring labor supply are not adequate to give a precise identification, and the Department concluded more information was needed.
On that point we entirely agree with them, that more information and data are needed about the current and future IT labor market.
Page 101 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
That concludes my statement.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Ms. Joyner.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Joyner follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF CARLOTTA C. JOYNER, DIRECTOR, EDUCATION AND EMPLOYMENT ISSUES, HEALTH, EDUCATION, AND HUMAN SERVICES DIVISION, U.S. GENERAL ACCOUNTING OFFICE Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: We are pleased to be here today to discuss our assessment of the Department of Commerce's report on the demand and supply of information technology workers.
Industry reports and various newspaper and magazine articles predict that severe shortages of information technology (IT) workers could have a crippling effect on the growth of the economy.
In conjunction with cosponsoring a convocation on the supply of IT workers, the U.S. Department of Commerce prepared a report intended to bring attention to the issue and to encourage stakeholders to examine the potential for shortages and to take the necessary steps to ensure an adequate supply of IT workers.
That report, issued September 29, 1997, is titled America's New Deficit: The Shortage of Information Technology Workers.(see footnote 7) Today, I would like to discuss our recent report on the Commerce Department's analysis of the demand and supply of IT workers and its conclusion that a shortage of IT workers exists in the United States.(see footnote 8) In conducting our work, we reviewed Commerce's report and interviewed officials at the Departments of Commerce and Labor.
To assess Commerce's analysis of IT worker supply and demand and to evaluate the basis for its conclusion that there is a shortage of IT workers, we compared the data presented in the report with other available data from sources such as the Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS), the National Science Foundation, and the Information Technology Association of America (ITAA).
We did not perform any independent analysis to determine whether a shortage of IT workers exists in the United States.
Rather, we limited our work to analyzing the methodology used by the Department of Commerce in reaching its conclusion.
Page 102 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
In summary, we found that Commerce's report has serious analytical and methodological weaknesses that undermine the credibility of its conclusion that a shortage of IT workers exists.
However, the lack of support presented in this one report should not necessarily lead to a conclusion that there is no shortage.
Instead, as the Commerce report states, additional information and data are needed to more accurately characterize the IT labor market now and in the future.
The report appears to appropriately establish that the demand for IT workers is expected to grow, but it does not adequately describe the likely supply of IT workers.
Although Commerce reported that only 24,553 U.S. students earned bachelor's degrees in computer and information sciences in 1994, Commerce also stated that BLS projects increasing job growth--an annual average of 95,000 new computer programmers, systems analysts and computer scientists and engineers will be required to satisfy the increasing demand for IT workers between 1994 and 2005.
Pointing to the disparity between these two numbers and referring to evidence from other sources, Commerce concludes in the report's title and introduction that there is a shortage of IT workers.
Commerce did not, however, consider other likely sources of workers, such as college graduates with degrees in other areas.
As a result, rather than supporting its conclusion that a shortage of IT workers exists, the data and analysis support the report's observation that more needs to be known about the supply and demand for IT workers.
BACKGROUND ITAA, a trade association, issued a report entitled Help Wanted: The IT Workforce Gap at the Dawn of a New Century in February 1997 that focused on issues relating to the IT labor market.(see footnote 9) Responding to this report, the National Economic Council and the Departments of Commerce, Education, and Labor began to discuss the workforce requirements of the IT sector; subsequently, federal officials agreed to cosponsor a convocation on the IT worker issue.
The convocation, cosponsored by the Departments of Commerce and Education, the University of California at Berkeley, and ITAA, was designed to bring together leaders from industry, academia, and government to develop new educational strategies and forge partnerships that would increase the quantity and quality of the American IT workforce.
Federal officials noted that the convocation would support the administration's goals for lifelong learning.
Page 103 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Commerce's Office of Technology Policy was assigned the lead federal role in working with ITAA on the IT worker issue.
The Office of Technology Policy's mission is to work with the private sector to develop and advocate national policies that maximize technology's contribution to U.S. economic growth, the creation of high-wage jobs, and improvements in Americans' quality of life.
In preparation for the January 12-13, 1998, convocation, the Department of Commerce issued its report, America's New Deficit: The Shortage of Information Technology Workers, examining the potential for shortages of IT workers.
DEMAND FOR IT WORKERS In its report, Commerce presented BLS projections that between 1994 and 2005 the United States would require slightly over 1 million additional IT workers.
BLS projections, based on surveys conducted for the Occupational Employment Statistics program and on the Current Population Survey, estimate future occupational needs resulting from expected national growth and separations from employment over time.
Although there is no single, universally accepted definition of the occupations that should be designated as IT occupations, Commerce based its analysis of demand on job growth projections for the three IT occupations used by BLS--computer programmers, systems analysts, and computer scientists and engineers.
BLS descriptions of these occupations are as follows: (1) computer programmers write and maintain the detailed instructions, called ''programs'' or ''software,'' that list in logical order the steps that computers must execute to perform their functions; (2) systems analysts use their knowledge and skills in a problem solving capacity, implementing the means for computer technology to meet the individual needs of an organization; (3) computer scientists generally design computers and conduct research to improve their design or use, and develop and adapt principles for applying computers to new uses; and (4) computer engineers work with the hardware and software aspects of systems design and development.
Page 104 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
BLS projections for new IT workers over the 11 years from 1994 to 2005 include IT workers to fill newly created jobs (820,000) in the three occupational categories and to replace workers (227,000) who are leaving these fields as a result of retirement, change of profession, or other reasons.
The report noted that, according to BLS, of the three IT occupations, the greatest job growth is predicted for systems analysts (92 percent).
(See table 1.)
The number of computer engineers and scientists is expected to grow by 90 percent, while the number of computer programmer positions is expected to grow at a much slower rate (12 percent).
The projected job growth for all occupations between 1994 and 2005 is 14 percent.
Since the report was issued, Commerce has issued an update with revised BLS projections showing even stronger growth.
Between 1996 and 2006, there will be over 1.3 million projected job openings as a result of growth and net replacements; about 1.1 million of these job openings will be due to growth alone.
Table 5
Source: BLS.
SUPPLY OF IT WORKERS Commerce identifies the supply of potential IT workers as the number of students graduating with bachelor's degrees in computer and information sciences.
The report presents data from the Department of Education showing that 24,553 students earned bachelor's degrees in computer and information sciences in 1994, a decline of more than 40 percent from 1986.
While the Commerce report highlights the supply of IT workers as those with bachelor's degrees in computer and information sciences, Commerce does note that IT workers may also acquire needed skills through other training paths--master's degrees, associate degrees, or special certification programs.
Commerce's report also includes information from BLS that indicates, in the case of computer professionals, there is no universally accepted way to prepare for such a career but that employers almost always seek college graduates.
Page 105 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Commerce's analysis of the supply of IT workers, however, did not consider (1) the numerical data for degrees and certifications in computer and information sciences other than at the bachelor's level when they quantify the total available supply; (2) college graduates with degrees in other areas; and (3) workers who have been, or will be, retrained for these occupations.
Regarding these other sources of workers, the report sometimes acknowledges their relevance to a definition of supply but does not include estimates of workers from those sources in its overall estimate of supply.
For example, Commerce reported that in 1994, 15,187 degrees and awards were earned in computer and information science programs below the bachelor's level, but this number was not included in the supply number for IT workers when Commerce compared the IT worker demand with the available supply.
Commerce also noted that, although employers almost always seek college graduates for computer professional positions, there is no universally accepted way to prepare for a career as a computer professional.
According to the BLS Occupational Outlook Handbook, which defines qualifications for jobs and careers in terms of education and experience of IT workers with a bachelor's degree, some workers have a degree in computer science, mathematics, or information systems, while others have taken special courses in computer programming to supplement their study in other fields such as accounting or other business areas.
According to the National Science Foundation, only about 25 percent of those employed in computer and information science jobs in 1993 actually had degrees in computer and information science.(see footnote 10) Other workers in these fields had degrees in such areas as business, social sciences, mathematics, engineering, psychology, economics, and education.
The Commerce report did not take this information into account in any way in estimating the future supply of IT workers.
The report also stated that IT workers acquire needed skills through various training paths, but it provided no analysis of the extent to which companies are training and retraining workers.
Page 106 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
COMMERCE'S CONCLUSION REGARDING SHORTAGE OF IT WORKERS The Commerce report cited four pieces of evidence that an inadequate supply of IT workers is emerging--rising salaries for IT workers, reports of unfilled vacancies for IT workers, offshore sourcing and recruiting, and the fact that the estimated supply of IT workers (based on students graduating with bachelor's degrees in computer and information sciences) is less than its estimate of the demand.
However, the report fails to provide clear, complete, and compelling evidence for a shortage or a potential shortage of IT workers with the four sources of evidence presented.
First, although some data show rising salaries for IT workers, other data indicate that those increases in earnings have been commensurate with the rising earnings of all professional specialty occupations.
Second, the ITAA study gives some indication of a shortage of IT workers by providing information on unfilled IT jobs.
However, in our view, ITAA's survey response rate of 14 percent is inadequate to form a basis for a nationwide estimate of unfilled IT jobs.
Third, although the report cites instances of companies drawing upon talent pools outside the United States to meet their demands for workers, not enough information is provided about the magnitude of this phenomenon.
Finally, while the report discusses various sources of potential supply of IT workers, it used only the number of students earning bachelor's degrees in computer and information sciences when it compared the potential supply of workers with the magnitude of IT worker demand.
Salaries for IT Workers Commerce stated that upward movement in salaries is evidence of a short supply of IT workers and cited several surveys and newspaper articles illustrating salary increases.
For example, the report cited a survey conducted by the Deloitte 
The report also cited an annual survey by Computerworld, a weekly newspaper covering the computer industry and targeting IT workers and managers, showing that in 11 of 26 positions tracked, average salaries increased by more than 10 percent from 1996 to 1997.
Increases in starting salaries were also reported in the Wall Street Journal and the Washington Post.
Page 107 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
These wage increases, however, may not be conclusive evidence of a long-term limited supply of IT workers, but may be an indication of a current tightening of labor market conditions for IT workers.
According to BLS data, increases have been less substantial when viewed over a longer period of time.
For example, the percentage changes in weekly earnings for workers in computer occupations over the 1983 through 1997 period were comparable to or slightly lower, in the case of computer systems analysts and scientists, than the percentage changes for all professional specialty occupations.
Thus, salary increases for these occupations have been consistent with the salary increases for other skilled occupational categories over time.
What is uncertain is whether the recent trend toward higher rates of increase will continue.
Reports of Unfilled Vacancies Regarding unfilled jobs, Commerce cited the ITAA report,(see footnote 11) which concluded that about 190,000 U.S.
IT jobs were unfilled in 1996 because of a shortage of qualified workers, and that these shortages were likely to worsen.
According to the ITAA survey, 82 percent of the IT companies responding expected to increase their IT staffing in the coming year, while more than half of the non-IT companies planned IT staff increases.
The Commerce report should have cautioned readers, however, that the ITAA survey has a major methodological weakness.
While the ITAA study provides useful information on unfilled jobs among the firms responding to its survey, the findings cannot be generalized to the national level.
ITAA surveyed a random sample of 2,000 large and midsize IT and non-IT companies about their IT labor needs and received a total of 271 responses--a response rate of about 14 percent.
We consider a 14-percent response rate to be unacceptably low as a basis for any generalizations about the population being surveyed.
In order to make sound generalizations, the effective response rate should usually be at least 75 percent(see footnote 12) for each variable measured--a goal used by many practitioners.(see footnote 13) Furthermore, ITAA's estimate of the number of unfilled IT jobs is based on reported vacancies, and adequate information about those vacancies is not provided, such as how long positions have been vacant, whether wages offered are sufficient to attract qualified applicants, and whether companies consider jobs filled by contractors as vacancies.
These weaknesses tend to undermine the reliability of ITAA's survey findings.(see footnote 14) Page 108 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Offshore Sourcing and Recruiting Commerce cited support for an emerging shortage in its observation that some companies are drawing upon talent pools outside the United States to meet their demands for IT workers.
For example, the Commerce report stated that India has more than 200,000 programmers and, in conjunction with predominantly U.S. partners, has developed into one of the world's largest exporters of software; in 1996 and 1997, outsourced software development accounted for 41 percent of India's software exports.
Commerce also cited a Business Week article, ''Forget the Huddled Masses: Send Nerds,'' to illustrate that companies are searching for IT workers in foreign labor markets such as Russia, Eastern Europe, East Asia, and South Africa.
However, the Commerce report stated that some professional engineering societies believe information regarding a short supply of IT workers in the United States is exaggerated and that it is not necessary to recruit foreign workers to fill IT jobs.
Additional systematic information about the magnitude of the phenomenon of companies meeting their demands for IT workers outside of the United States would be useful.
Estimated Supply Compared with Estimated Demand The report identified the decline in the number of computer science graduates as a factor contributing to an inadequate supply of IT workers.
The introduction to the report stated that evidence suggests that job growth in information technology fields now exceeds the production of talent.
Commerce reported that between 1994 and 2005, an annual average of 95,000 new systems analysts, computer scientists and engineers, and computer programmers will be required to satisfy the increasing demand for IT workers and that only 24,553 students earned bachelor's degrees in computer and information sciences in 1994.
Because there is a disparity between these two numbers, Commerce concluded that it will be difficult to meet the demand for IT workers.
Page 109 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Commerce did not adequately explain why the decline in conferred bachelor's degrees in computer science would reflect a short supply of IT workers.
As stated in the section on supply, IT workers come from a variety of educational backgrounds and have a variety of educational credentials such as master's degrees, associate degrees, or special certifications.
In addition, Commerce reported on the decline from 1986, although that year represents a peak in the number of computer science degrees conferred, which had risen steadily from the 1970s but has remained relatively stable in the 1990s.
Commerce's Conclusions in the Report Commerce's conclusions about the IT workforce are inconsistently reported in separate segments of its report.
First, the title of the report states that America's new deficit is a shortage of information technology workers.
The introduction also states that there is substantial evidence that the United States is having trouble keeping up with the demand for new information technology workers.
However, the report notes that current statistical frameworks and mechanisms for measuring labor supply do not allow for precise identification of IT worker shortages and, in its summary chapter, Commerce concludes that more information is needed to fully characterize the IT labor market.
We agree with Commerce's conclusion that more information and data are needed about the current and future IT labor market.
Mr. Chairman, this concludes my prepared statement.
I will be happy to answer any questions that you or Members of the Subcommittee may have.
Page 110 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Mr. Fraser, let me make sure I understand your testimony.
Is the Department of Labor in favor of raising the H-1B cap or not? Mr. FRASER.
Mr. Chairman, the administration has been looking at this question and talking with members.
The administration's view is that our first step in increasing the availability of skilled workers must be training and preparing U.S. workers.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
I heard the first priority and last priority.
I guess I am getting to, are there any circumstances where we could increase the H-1B cap that the administration would support? Mr. FRASER.
The administration would be willing to work out a package that includes reforms to the program, include significant increases in investment in training and development to meet this goal of looking first to the U.S. workforce, developing U.S. workers, training people to fill these jobs.
We would be willing to work out a package that possibly---- Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
You would support an increase if there were certain conditions, certain attestations, certain safeguards.
Mr. FRASER.
And training.
A commitment to increase training investment and efforts.
I believe that is correct, Mr. Smith.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
You mentioned attestations.
Any particular attestations that are significant to you? Page 111 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. FRASER.
Yes, sir.
The administration, as I said, since 1993 has been urging the Congress to add two attestations to the program, one that the employer has taken timely and significant steps to recruit U.S. workers for the jobs for which they are seeking nonimmigrants.
It seems entirely feasible that if we are going to give employers access to foreign temporary workers, that they should at least first try to find a U.S. worker to fill the job.
Secondly, that the employer will not lay off, fire, displace U.S. workers in order to replace them with foreign temporary workers.
To us, these are common-sense, reasonable, straightforward requirements.
From what we hear from the information technology industry, they should not be burdened by those attestations.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Would you have an attestation of no layoff apply just to particular location or have it apply across the board to anywhere within the business? Mr. FRASER.
We would apply it to the occupational category.
It would apply to individuals who are similarly qualified.
So the pool---- Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Regardless of where they may be located? Mr. FRASER.
Yes, sir.
If an employer is going to go to India or to China or to Thailand to find a worker, they ought to be able to look within their own operations in California or Indiana or in Texas.
Page 112 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Mr. Fraser, you alluded to abuses in the H-1B program.
But if that is the case, why have there been so few investigations by the Department of Labor of any abuses? Mr. FRASER.
In large part, Mr. Smith, our investigative authority is constrained to respond to complaints alleging violations.
Of course, nonimmigrants, who are legally bound to their employer, can't work and reside legally in the United States without maintaining their job, are dependent on the employer eventually to sponsor them for permanent immigration, and thus have many incentives not to lodge complaints.
We have had about 300 complaints in the 8 years of this program.
Of those that have presented reasonable cause, nearly 90 percent have involved wage violations.
And the small number we don't think in any way indicates the potential extent of violations in the program.
Just to give you an example, in the IG's report, when the IG looked at a random sample of employers using the H-1B program, they found one in five pays less than the wage they promised to pay on their application.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Who conducted that? Mr. FRASER.
The Office of Inspector General of the Department of Labor in an independent audit found that 19 percent of employers---- Page 113 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
This is 19 percent? Mr. FRASER.
Yes, sir.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Okay.
Thank you, Mr. Fraser.
Ms. Joyner, let me ask you the obvious question, which is that if the GAO would argue that we don't have definitive evidence to know whether there is a shortage or not, how are we going to find out or know whether there is a shortage if, in fact, it doesn't exist? Ms. JOYNER.
Well, I think one answer to that might lie in the reverse side of some of the criticisms that we levied toward the Commerce Department report.
Our concern was largely of a failure to do a thorough enough analysis to document the likely supply, so that there were sources that could be quantified that hadn't been quantified in this.
I mentioned, for example, the people who get degrees, other than associate's degrees, that it would be possible perhaps to get a better understanding of how much training and retraining is currently being done, which would give some sense of the potential to bring people into the field from other areas and to look more broadly and to some extent, as the Labor Department has focused, on increasing the supply by enhancing the training for people.
So I think taking that into consideration would give one a better sense of how these balance out.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Okay, thank you, Ms. Joyner.
I don't have any other questions.
Page 114 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The gentleman from North Carolina, Mr. Watt, is recognized.
Mr. WATT.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Let me maybe ask a question that the Chairman asked in a slightly different way to be sure I understand where the administration is.
Sometimes we hear from the Department of Labor, then we hear something else from the Department of Commerce and somebody else in the Administration.
Do I understand that the administration's position on this is that they will oppose increases in the H-1B category unless there are substantial reforms to the H-1B program? Is that the administration's view? Mr. FRASER.
That is the administration's view, Mr. Watt.
The administration, for example, has strongly opposed Senator Abraham's bill, S. 1723 in the Senate, on the grounds that it did not provide the needed reforms in this program and did not provide for substantial increases in investment and training and education to prepare U.S. workers for these high-tech jobs, for these good jobs we want U.S. workers to have.
Mr. WATT.
And the entities that got together in the administration and talked about this--I assume there was some entities.
Who were they? Mr. FRASER.
The same entities that kept us up until 9 o'clock last night finalizing the testimony.
Page 115 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
This is an effort that has been coordinated by the National Economic Council and Domestic Policy Council, involving Department of Justice, Department of Commerce, Department of Labor, Department of State, all of the affected agencies, the Department of Treasury, all have been involved in the deliberations around this topic.
Mr. WATT.
So I can assume that those agencies would recommend to the President he veto a bill unless it had substantial safeguards and reforms in it such as you have described? Mr. FRASER.
Mr. Watt, I don't know that that particular bridge has been crossed at this point, but certainly with respect to the markup of the Senate bill, Secretary Herman, Secretary Daley, and the Attorney General, all joined together to write a letter to the Judiciary Committee in the Senate to say that we would strongly oppose this bill for the reasons that I have cited.
Mr. WATT.
Okay.
Let me go to another issue.
Increasing the H-1B numbers, I have heard, would be in response to what would be perceived as a temporary shortage.
What is the maximum amount of time that the administration would support an increase if we could get the reforms done and is there some maximum period of time that you would be talking about? Mr. FRASER.
Well, the labor market, as I indicated in my testimony, has already shown signs of making adjustments to meet increased demand.
We have seen college-level, bachelor-level enrollments in computer science and engineering almost double in the last 2 years; and a relatively small fraction of those are foreign students.
Page 116 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The administration, I am sure, would find any temporary increase in the cap, assuming there are the reforms to the program and substantial means of helping the labor market make a more rapid adjustment through training and education, look at 3 to 4 years as the outside limit on such an adjustment.
Mr. WATT.
What impact, if any, does the stuff I have been reading about, potential layoffs in the high-tech industry, have on this issue? Mr. FRASER.
Well, there have been several recent announcements.
Intel, AT
Mr. WATT.
Are those layoffs, as you understand it, in the high-tech category of workers that H-1B is designed to cover? Mr. FRASER.
Yes, sir, that is our understanding.
Of course, we have only seen the news accounts of these.
But that is our understanding, that these occupations for which H-1B workers are brought into the country are involved in these layoffs.
Our reform proposal would help assure that companies that are displacing, laying off U.S. workers will not then be able to turn around and fill those jobs with foreign temporary workers and that they will look first in the U.S. labor market and in their own labor force to try to fill job vacancies as they occur.
Page 117 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. WATT.
Now, one of the concerns I have heard expressed about putting new reforms, requirements, certifications, so forth into the process is that it will substantially delay a process of getting workers that needs to be time sensitive.
How do you respond to that? And is there anything in this administration's proposals that would directly address that? Mr. FRASER.
Yes, Mr. Watt.
In the administration's proposal there would be no source of new delay in the application process.
Right now in the law, an employer seeking a foreign temporary worker has to submit, as the first step, a one-page form to the Department of Labor on which four boxes are checked.
The administration's proposal is to add, as I indicated to the Chairman, two more boxes to that form, one saying that the employer had taken steps to recruit U.S. workers, and the other having the employer promise not to lay off U.S. workers in those occupations.
That form, under the law, must be processed by the Department of Labor within 7 days of receipt.
Nothing about that requirement in the law would change.
The law, as currently written, says that the Department of Labor cannot reject that application unless it is incomplete or contains obvious inaccuracies.
Nothing about that law would change with the administration's reform proposals.
The net effect, in terms of delaying access, would be that employers would have to make two more check marks on this form.
And from what the IT industry has been telling us for 8 years, they make exhaustive efforts to recruit U.S. workers.
The tight labor market doesn't allow them to ignore qualified, available U.S. workers.
So we don't see how checking those two boxes can either add any delay to the process or form a burden on the IT industry.
Page 118 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Would the gentleman yield just for a minute? Mr. WATT.
I don't have any time left, but if the Chairman gives me some more time, I will yield it to him.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Mr. Fraser, you mentioned it is just a matter of checking two boxes.
But don't those two check marks entail, perhaps, a great deal of time-consuming effort? Mr. FRASER.
That is often asserted, Mr. Chairman, but, in fact, the IT industry has been telling us, and I have been talking to the industry for the 8 years we have been administering this program, we meet quarterly with many of the industry associations--and in every conversation they tell us over and over again about the extent of their efforts to recruit U.S. workers through a variety of means, about how they don't have the luxury in the search for qualified workers to fill their jobs to displace or lay off U.S. workers in order to fill them with temporary foreign workers.
So the boxes do represent an attestation of certain behavior by the employer, but those are behaviors that the IT industry in particular has told us, and I think will tell you today, that it routinely pursues.
So we don't perceive that it imposes any new burden on the industry.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you, Mr. Fraser.
Page 119 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The gentleman from Indiana, Mr. Pease, is recognized; and then the gentlewoman from California, Ms. Lofgren.
And let me say I have to step out for a minute, but if you all will continue.
Mr. PEASE.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. Fraser, your presentation has been very helpful, and I appreciate your initially putting it in a framework for us to consider with sort of a checklist that you had gone through.
That is very helpful to me as well.
Much of my interest in this comes from colleagues and former colleagues in higher education from throughout my district, and they tell me information that is mostly secondhand about the concern in the IT workforce, although there is some industry concern in my territory as well.
I wanted you to share a little bit more information on your analysis of the potential skill shortage of skilled workers based on analysis of relative growth in the wage rate as perhaps a better indicator of whether there really is a problem here or how serious the problem might be.
Mr. FRASER.
Mr. Pease, I don't know if this will help you at all, but I brought with me a chart here that compares the wage trends over the last 10 years for all workers with 4 years of college and workers in the three major categories of---- Page 120 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Ms. LOFGREN.
Would it be possible to share that with the whole panel? Mr. FRASER.
I would be happy to.
I just pulled it out of the book, Ms. Lofgren, but I would be happy to share this with you all.
[The information follows:] 58001c.eps Source: U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, Employment and Earnings, Household data.
Annual averages (published in January after each year).
It compares the wage trends from the BLS data with the three major IT occupational categories that BLS tracks: computer programmers, operations systems research analysts, computer system analysts and scientists.
As you can see, just from the chart of the curve, while some of the higher skilled computer jobs do pay higher on average than for all professional occupations, the trends in wage growth have been basically the same over the last 10 years.
Now, in 1996-1997, you can see there was a jump in the computer programmer category.
I know you will hear more from other witnesses today that have information from industry surveys that have different cuts at this information.
But the general point is that a usually good reliable indicator of emerging skill shortages is significant increases in wages as the market adjusts.
The data that we have from BLS, admittedly for fairly broad occupational categories, doesn't indicate that at this point.
And that is a fact we thought was worth calling to the attention of the subcommittee, and we would be happy to provide this data to all the members.
Page 121 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. PEASE.
I would appreciate it, and I think it would be helpful to us.
You made a comment in your presentation that increasing legal immigration leads to increasing illegal immigration.
Can you expand on what you meant by that? Mr. FRASER.
I said, Mr. Pease, that we need to be cognizant of the fact that if we are going to increase the H-1B cap, we should expect that we will, in the short term, be increasing both legal employment-based immigration and perhaps illegal immigration.
Mr. PEASE.
What is your basis for that? Mr. FRASER.
I will explain that to you.
About half of the individuals who adjust to permanent employment-based immigrant status do so from the H-1 Visa category.
So about half of the folks who become permanent employment-based immigrants transition out of the H-1 status.
As you heard in earlier testimony, the employment-based visa, permanent immigrant visa numbers are underutilized.
So if half of the H-1B workers are going to ultimately transition into employment-based immigration status, then we can expect those numbers to increase and perhaps put some pressure on the cap on the permanent immigrant side.
On the illegal side, INS estimates that about 40 percent of the resident illegal population in the United States are visa overstayers.
Many of those folks are foreign visitors and folks in nonimmigrant status for employment and other reasons.
If you increase the pool of nonimmigrants by raising the cap, you can expect that there will be some increase in the number of visa overstayers as a result.
It is hard to predict the dimensions of that.
Page 122 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Ms. LOFGREN.
Would the gentleman yield on that point? Do you have any data to support that that trend applies with H-1Bs? Mr. FRASER.
Just what I cited, Ms. Lofgren.
Ms. LOFGREN.
Your bald extrapolation without any data? Mr. FRASER.
No, based on the studies that INS has done over the last couple of years to try to scope the demographics and the composition of the---- Ms. LOFGREN.
I thank the gentleman.
I would very much like to get the report that you are referring to that documents overstays in the H-1B program.
Mr. PEASE.
And related to that, you also made a statement, or words to this effect, that the H-1B program is a tool for hiring illegals.
Can you explain a little more what you meant by that? Mr. FRASER.
I was quoting there, Mr. Pease, from the Office of Inspector General report.
I brought a copy of that, if you would like to have that for the record of the hearing.
What they found was that, while often the H-1B program is used for the purposes that it is intended, to give employers access to needed skills in international labor markets, it is not uncommon for the program to be used for other purposes, and that is really as a probationary employment program.
Page 123 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
We have seen the trend of employers first making connections with foreign nonimmigrants when they are students in the United States, then hiring those folks for a period of a practicum, after they are students, then hiring them as H-1Bs, and, ultimately, after 5 or 6 years in that status, sponsoring them for permanent residency.
That is what the IG found, that quite often the program is used as a probationary employment program; that people who are employed under it in many cases are unauthorized to be employed in the United States; they are foreign visitors or foreign students who were first brought into the H-1B program.
So we do have their report if that would benefit this committee.
Mr. PEASE.
I think it would, but are you then suggesting that if we better enforced existing law we wouldn't need to increase the number of H-1B visas? Mr. FRASER.
We are suggesting that if the reforms that the administration has been calling for were incorporated, then it would really give--right now, the program operates so that employers are competing with each other on a first-come, first-serve basis.
Whoever's application gets in first gets access to foreign workers.
With the reforms we have been advocating, it is our view that U.S. employers, like in the IT industry, who are actively recruiting and looking for U.S. workers to fill their jobs, will be advantaged because they will be competing less with employers in the United States, including job contractors, who aren't really interested in finding U.S. workers for those jobs, so that there will be more room within the cap for those employers who really are facing skill shortages.
Page 124 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. PEASE.
I don't want to be accused of taking advantage of the Chairman's absence, so I will acknowledge my time is concluded and yield to Ms. Lofgren.
Ms. LOFGREN.
Thank you.
And I think I actually caused you to be over, so I will not be critical.
As I look and read through this testimony, it occurs to me that there are many themes at work here.
The H-1B program was originally not devised as a labor shortage answer.
It was devised so that talent could be chased by American firms.
That is why there is no job search requirement--so you can go after the best minds in the world.
If you are lucky, you'll be able to keep them in America, create innovation, wealth and prosperity.
I thought the list of the top 100 H-1B users was actually very interesting.
I was glad to have the list because I think it reflects the dichotomy of what is going on.
If you look at the Intel Corporation, and I use Intel as an example because it was the first name I actually recognized, it is quite a ways down the list.
Intel had 144 applicants, which is not a very large number for a company that has 63,700 employees.
Given the number of applicants, the huge number of actual employees, and the amount of money Intel is making, I assume that they are chasing the talent that was originally intended under the program.
But then I saw some companies that I have never heard of.
I don't want to be insulting to any of them, but I was born and raised in Silicon Valley.
I have lived there my whole life.
Number five on the list is a company called Wipro.
They have six, or seven times more applications than Intel.
And I have never heard of them.
Page 125 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
My father is 79, and I visit him often.
Sunday morning I went to see him in Palo Alto.
On the way I thought I would stop and take a look at Wipro.
The address is right off Central Express, right near Lawrence.
When I looked on Cobalt Way, Suite 107, I found a mail drop.
There were a dozen firms listed.
Wipro was not one of them.
So I thought I'd see if they are on Tautau.
Well, there is no Tautau Street in Cupertino.
There is a Tantau.
That is where Tandem is.
And it is right off Lawrence Expressway.
So I zoomed up Lawrence Expressway, and I found the building, and it was Suite 201 in this building.
There is no way you could fit 600 people in that building.
And I thought to myself what is going on here? So this is the question . . .
Is your problem or the concern about the main line employers that we know are on this list, the Oracles or the Intels, who are chasing talent, or is it the temporary agencies that really use huge numbers of these visas? If it is the temporary agencies, then I am struggling to understand why, given the tools you currently have, you cannot address the issue.
For example, let's look at the attestation.
You need to attest.
But how can you possibly attest if you have a mail drop and you are applying for 500 visas? The mailman could tell you there is fraud involved.
Mr. FRASER.
Well, Ms. Lofgren, that is an excellent question, and what you pointed to is a very serious problem with the way this program operates, not just in the IT field, but in the health care field as well.
And that is that there are an awful lot of employers who are in the body business, they are in the people business, using this program to bring in a large number of foreign temporary workers to lease out, contract out, to other employers.
Page 126 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Whether the companies' names that you recognize, to what extent the companies who you recognize on that list, unlike the Mastechs and the Syntels and the Tata Consultancies and so on, which are job contractors, they are body shops.
To what extent the Intels and Microsofts and Sun Micro Systems of the world use the services of those contractors, none of us can tell.
But in fact---- Ms. LOFGREN.
I can't either.
But since I do have limited time, let me follow up with a question I thought I had asked.
Given the current rules of the H-1B program, as outlined by Congress and administered by your agency and the Immigration Service, how could a consultancy firm hire 80 percent of their employees as H-1 visas, and actually perform no other service other than that of a temporary hiring agency? How would that comply with our current rules? Mr. FRASER.
Because the fundamental problem and the fundamental reason the administration has been urging reform is that there is nothing in current law that prevents that.
There is nothing in current law that prevents an employer from saying, I want an entirely nonimmigrant work force and some have entirely nonimmigrant work forces.
Ms. LOFGREN.
But they are not doing any work.
The whole idea is to say that you have posted.
But how can you post in these particular cases.
The posting would have to be in the companies that have utilized the temporary service.
I am sure there is a shortage.
We now have an unemployment rate of 1.6 percent among computer programmers, and it's even less than 1 percent in some of these fields.
So, it is very interesting to hear all this testimony about whether there is a shortage, but when full employment is defined as 4 percent, overall unemployment in Santa Clara County is 2.8 percent, and you have less than 1 percent unemployment in some of these tech fields, and under .05 in some of them, obviously there is a shortage in some of these fields.
Page 127 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
But going back, wouldn't the posting on the H-1Bs have to be at the various companies? Are you saying we need to tighten up the posting and the attestation for the temporary agencies, and if so, why is there nothing in your testimony about that? Mr. FRASER.
Well, I think our proposal is to, under the current cap, advantage employers who have a legitimate need for highly skilled, highly talented people in the international labor market, as opposed to those who have no interest, or little interest, in finding U.S. workers, and our two reforms are intended to get directly at that question.
Ms. LOFGREN.
If I may, Mr. Chairman, I don't think that is accurate.
You are going to attest that you are not going to layoff any American workers.
Mr. FRASER.
First---- Ms. LOFGREN.
But you don't have any American workers, you posted at your mail drop.
Mr. FRASER.
First, you have to attest that you are making bona fide efforts to find U.S. workers, that your first recourse is not to the international labor market.
That is the first reform.
You are making bona fide efforts to find U.S. workers.
Ms. LOFGREN.
If I may, I think that is pretty easy to do when in some of these fields you have .05 percent unemployment.
But going back, the issue that you talked about is who is being laid off in which large company.
I would add that no one does a press release about the hiring.
I think to look only at the cutbacks gives a very misleading picture about what is happening economically.
Our concern is that should Cyprus Semi have five H-1Bs if they are going to cut back a thousand people.
If the five H-1Bs are coming from the temporary agency, I just don't see how the reforms you have outlined address that situation.
Page 128 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. FRASER.
The reforms that we have outlined--.
Ms. LOFGREN.
Or so-called reforms.
Mr. FRASER.
If Cyprus Semiconductor were to, as it has announced it will do, lay off a number of workers, the reforms would require that before the company came back with its next application for a foreign---- Ms. LOFGREN.
But they are not the applicant in this case.
They are just hiring Tata.
Mr. FRASER.
Well, the administration's reform gets to layoff and displacement of U.S. workers, so if they were seeking to replace the laid off U.S. worker through contracting out with a firm that supplies temporary foreign workers, that would also be covered by the attestation that the administration advocates.
Ms. LOFGREN.
The red light is on.
If I may, I do agree with many of Ms. Joyner's reports.
You are right.
It is not just a computer science degree that leads to a high skill job.
I thought your comments were thoughtful.
I would, however, like to ask if there has been any analysis of the nature of the student bodies in some of these terms.
For example, when I go to Stanford or San Jose State, and by the way, the dean of engineering there very much supports an extension, I mean, what I am hearing from the deans in engineering and other physical sciences is more than half their student body are foreign students, especially in the graduate schools.
And so to look at people who are in graduate studies in computer science in American universities and say they are going to come, if we don't look and see that maybe two-thirds of them are actually foreign students and would only come here through the H-1B, might lead us to an erroneous conclusion as well.
Page 129 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for your indulgence.
Mr. SMITH OF TEXAS.
Thank you.
We thank the panelists as well and appreciate you being here.
We now move to our third and final panel: Harris Miller, President, Information Technology Association of America; Dr. Norman Matloff, Department of Computer Science, University of California at Davis; Daniel Sullivan, Senior Vice President for Human Resources, QUALCOMM; William Payson, the Senior Staff; Daryl Hatano, Vice President for International Trade and Government Affairs, Semiconductor Industry Association; David Smith, Director of Policy, AFL-CIO; and Dr. Richard Lariviere, Vice President of International Programs, from the well-known, well-respected institution the University of Texas at Austin.
Before we begin, let me say to you all that we are going to try to finish this panel as expeditiously as possible because there are a number of individuals who have to leave to catch flights or for other reasons.
Among them is David Smith, from the AFL-CIO, so we are going to proceed a little bit out of order and begin with Mr. Smith, so that we make sure we hear his testimony, and then we will go back to the order in which the witnesses are listed according to the agenda.
Mr. Smith, if you will begin.
Thank you.
STATEMENT OF DAVID A. SMITH, DIRECTOR OF POLICY, AFL-CIO Page 130 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Mr. SMITH.
Mr. Chairman, thank you for your indulgence.
Unfortunately, Continental Airlines wasn't as willing to accommodate my schedule as you are.
I will try to be brief.
I submitted a statement for the record, which I hope you will include, but let me try to summarize.
I am struck, Mr. Chairman, by the definition of the subject of today's hearing as a crisis, as a problem, as something that bodes ill for the American economy and for American workers.
Frankly, that strikes me as backwards.
What we have here is a fast growing industry, one that has doubled in size in the last decade, and it seems likely to again double in size in the next decade.
It is an industry that provides skilled jobs for working men and women.
It is an industry which has taken advantage of the international marketplace and is often held up as an exemplar of American know-how and of the resurgence of America's preeminence in the global economy.
This strikes us as an enormous opportunity, not as a crisis.
It is an opportunity for American workers to learn new skills, to get new jobs, to move into an industry which will substantially define the economy of the 21st century.
What is striking, and some of the colloquy between my friend, John Fraser, and Congresswoman Lofgren, at the end of the last panel, underscores my point, is that there is a chunk of this industry, primarily the job shops and the contractors, who don't want this opportunity to be seized by American workers, who would prefer to undercut the labor market, in fact they prefer to distort the labor market.
Page 131 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
It is ironic, that while much of the conversation about this industry and about its opportunity invokes the advantages of an unfettered marketplace, a marketplace which, free from undue interference and undue regulation, will prosper.
In fact, what folks who want to increase the H-1B cap or who resist some of the procedural reforms that the administration has talked about, want to do is rig this marketplace.
They want to rig the marketplace so that it doesn't work for American workers, that it doesn't provide the training, that it doesn't provide the opportunities to upgrade their skills.
In fact, they want to distort the marketplace in exactly the way that they often rail against in quarrel.
And I think that irony is compounded by another one.
I would urge all of you, however painful it might be, to think back to the Fast Track debate.
Those who supported Fast Track argued that our ability to compete in the international economy, our ability to have leading sectors and particularly sectors which were marked by our technological prowess grow, would be good for American workers.
Today's discussion, and the discussion about raising the cap, about substituting temporary foreign workers for American workers, belies many of those claims.
And if it is true that this brave new global economy marked by the information services industry, marked by high technology, is going to be good for American workers, then we need to make sure that American workers are those who are employed in this industry and reap its benefits.
I can't resist, and I won't belabor it, but the third irony, of course, here is at the same time that the industry in general is arguing for an increase in the cap and claiming shortage, many of the industries brightest stars, Xerox, Cyprus, Intel and Apple, are laying off precisely the workers that they claim are in demand.
John shared with you some wage data.
It is interesting to compare that, and I will provide it to the committee, with another chart that shows changes in employment in those same three sectors of the information technology industry.
Employment is rising, wages are not.
Now that tells us something.
Marketplaces do work.
If this marketplace were as tight as Congresswoman Lofgren suggested it is, wages would be rising.
We haven't yet repealed the fundamental laws of supply and demand in the labor market or any other market.
We are not seeing what every economist in this room and most economists around the country would tell you we would see if we were facing anything like a crisis.
Page 132 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Let me try to briefly outline, and it is detailed in my written testimony, let me briefly suggest what we think the right prescription is here.
The H-1B program can provide an important safety valve for an industry facing a real shortage, but at the moment it doesn't oblige a potential user to prove that there is a real shortage or to prove they, in a diligent and serious way, attempted to recruit American workers.
We ought to reform the system so that both attestations are a necessary condition of receiving an H-1B allocation.
And, second, we ought to make sure that this does not become a system where job shops hiring low wage computer professionals from foreign countries drive down and distort the labor market in the country.
And the way to do that, and I think the administration is on target here, the way to do that is to, in addition to insisting upon bona fide efforts to recruit, to insist that no layoffs can proceed with a subsequent request for H-1B status.
Let me end, very briefly, Mr. Chairman, by suggesting that another important part of seizing this opportunity is putting in place the kind of education and training programs, and the kind of skill upgrading programs for incumbent workers that ensure that these opportunities can be seized by American workers, so that American firms will continue to prosper well into the next century.
We don't think there is much evidence of a crisis, we do think there is a lot of evidence of a great opportunity for our country and for this vibrant sector of the country's economy.
The task of this subcommittee, it seems to me, is to help us seize it.
Page 133 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
Thank you very much.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Smith follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID A. SMITH, DIRECTOR OF POLICY, AFL-CIO Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: On behalf of the AFL-CIO I would like to thank Chairman Smith and Ranking Minority member Representative Watt for the invitation to testify at this hearing on an issue of great importance to organized labor.
The real issue before you today is not whether or not the cap on H-1B immigration should be raised, but whether or not the American employers and the American government consider American workers valuable enough to afford them the opportunity to train for and get well-paying, secure jobs.
You have an opportunity to see to it that that opportunity is seized and to take steps to halt the abuse of this country's immigration laws by those who would deny Americans job opportunities and drive wages down.
The appropriate long-term approach to current and future labor shortages lies in the development of effective, efficient training and education programs that help American workers to gain new skills.
Any temporary guestworker program should be limited to those rare instances where there truly is a demonstrated, urgent, short-term labor shortage that cannot be immediately addressed.
We must not overreact to the unproven claim of the IT industry that such a shortage exists today and that we, therefore, must expand a seriously flawed program.
Page 134 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
The IT industry has not made a sufficient case to warrant an increase in the H-1B cap Recent media reports of massive layoffs belie the IT industry's claims of a shortage of workers.
The Wall Street Journal, hardly an enemy of the IT industry, reported on April 13 that ''the past couple of weeks have seen a steady drumbeat of layoff announcements in industry sectors that until recently have complained about personnel shortages.''
Xerox and Intel announced plans to layoff a total of 12,000 employees, and smaller firms in Silicon Valley, including Netscape Communications and Apple Computer, have also announced layoffs.
This development is not surprising in light of the March 20 report of the General Accounting Office that the Information Technology Association of America (ITAA) and Department of Commerce studies frequently cited as establishing proof of massive IT labor shortages were so fundamentally flawed that it could not verify any shortage or workers, much less one of the magnitude claimed by the IT industry.
An increase in the H-1B cap should not even be considered until there is clear substantiation that a labor shortage actually exists, and that vacancy rates cannot be remedied by improved pay and working conditions.
In fact, the current H-1B program should be reassessed periodically to determine if a shortage of U.S. workers actually exists in those fields for which H-1B workers are employed.
Without such review, a large general increase of foreign workers such as that proposed by Sen. Abraham in S.1723 will exacerbate unemployment problems in fields such as occupational and physical therapists and engineers, which already face labor surpluses.
The H-1B program must be reformed Under current law, an employer does not have to demonstrate a labor shortage, undertake recruitment efforts, or improve training programs as a condition of receiving approval for an H-1B visa application.
All of these steps would improve our labor market.
Under current law, the employer only needs to check off boxes on a form stating they will pay the worker the local prevailing rate, that no strike or lock-out exists, notice has been provided to workers and the union, and that working conditions of U.S. workers will not be adversely affected by the hiring of the H-1B worker.
An understaffed DOL has only 7 days to review the application for completeness and technical inaccuracies.
Current law does not require a market test for the availability of qualified U.S. workers or prohibit the layoff of U.S. workers in order to hire H-1B workers.
Because the H-1B status can last up to six years, employers can and do game the system.
They use the category to hire entry-level foreign workers, see how they work out as employees and then sponsor the foreign worker for permanent residency if they like them.
Current law provides no remedy for a U.S. worker who is laid off and replaced with a foreign worker, and no remedy for a U.S. worker whose resume or applications is never considered by an employer reserving a position for an H-1B worker.
Reforms of the H-1B program that give protection to American workers and ensure DOL the authority and resources to enforce the law are necessary.
At a minimum: Page 135 PREV PAGE TOP OF DOC
1.
Employers must attest that they have taken timely and significant steps to recruit and retain U.S. workers.
2.
Employers also must attest that they have not laid-off or otherwise displaced U.S. workers in the occupations for which they seek H-1B workers in the periods preceding and following their seeking such workers.
3.
DOL must be given the tools necessary to enforce th
